Baa (noun)
Baa. n.s. [See the verb.] The cry of a sheep.

Baa (verb)
To Baa. v.n. [balo, Lat.] To cry like a sheep.
Or like a lamb, whose dam away is fet,He treble baas for help, but none can get. Sidney.

Babble (noun)
Ba'bble. n.s. [babil, Fr.] Idle talk; senseless prattle.
This babble shall not henceforth trouble me;Here is a coil with protestation! Shakesp. Two G. of Verona.
                            Come, no more,This is mere moral babble. Milton.
With volleys of eternal babble,And clamour more unanswerable. Hudibras.
The babble, impertinence, and folly, I have taken notice of in disputes. Glanville's Scepsis Scientifica.

Babble (verb)
To Ba'bble. v.n. [babbeln, Germ. babiller, Fr.]

 To prattle like a child; to prate imperfectly.
My babbling praises I repeat no more,But hear, rejoice, stand silent, and adore. Prior.
 To talk idly, or irrationally.
John had conned over a catalogue of hard words; these he used to babble indifferently in all companies. Arbuthn. J. Bull.
                Let the silent sanctuary show,What from the babbling schools we may not know. Prior.
  To talk thoughtlessly; to tell secrets.
There is more danger in a reserved and silent friend, than in a noisy babbling enemy. L'Estrange.
 To talk much.
        The babbling echo mocks the hounds,Replying shrilly to the well tun'd horns,As if a double hunt were heard at once. Shakesp. Tit. Andr.
And had I pow'r to give that knowledge birth,In all the speeches of the babbling earth. Prior.
The babbling echo had descry'd his face;She, who in others words her silence breaks. Addison's Ovid.

Babblement
Ba'bblement. n.s. [from babble.] Senseless prate.
Deluded all this while with ragged notions and babblements, while they expected worthy and delightful knowledge. Milton.

Babbler
Ba'bbler. n.s. [from babble.]

 An idle talker; an irrational prattler.
We hold our time too precious to be spentWith such a babbler. Shakesp. King John.
Great babblers, or talkers, are not fit for trust. L'Estrange.
The apostle of my text had no sooner proposed it to the greater masters at Athens, but he himself was ridiculed as a babbler. Rogers.
 A teller of secrets.
Utterers of secrets he from thence debarr'd;Babblers of folly, and blazers of crime. Fairy Queen, b. ii.

Babe
Babe. n. s. [baban, Welch; babbaerd, Dutch.] An infant; a child of either sex.
                Those that do teach your babes,Do it with gentle means, and easy tasks;He might have chid me so: for, in good faith,I am a child to chiding. Shakesp. Othello.
Nor shall Sebastian's formidable nameBe longer us'd, to lull the crying babe. Dryden's Don Seb,
The babe had all that infant care beguiles,And early knew his mother in her smiles. Dryden.

Babery
Ba'bery. n. s. [from babe.] Finery to please a babe or child.
So have I seen trim books in velvet dight,With golden leaves and painted baberyOf seely boys, please unacquainted sight. Sidney.

Babish
Ba'bish. adj. [from babe.] Childish.
If he be bashful, and will soon blush, they call him a babish and ill brought up thing. Ascham's Schoolmaster.

Baboon
Babo'on. n.s. [babouin, Fr. It is supposed by Skinner to be the augmentation of babe, and to import a great babe.] A monkey of the largest kind.
You had looked through the grate like a geminy of baboons. Shakesp. Merry Wives of Windsor.
He cast every human feature out of his countenance, and became a baboon. Addison. Spect. № 174.

Baby
Ba'by. n.s. [See Babe.]

 A child; an infant.
The baby beats the nurse, and quite athwartGoes all decorum. Shakesp. Measure for Measure.
The child must have sugar plumbs, rather than make the poor baby cry. Locke.
He must marry, and propagate: the father cannot stay for the portion, nor the mother for babies to play with. Locke.
 A small image in imitation of a child, which girls play with.
The archduke saw that Perkin would prove a runnagate; and that it was the part of children to fall out about babies. Bacon's Henry VII.
Since no image can represent the great Creator, never think to honour him by your foolish puppets, and babies of dirt and clay. Stillingfleet's Def. of Disc. on Rom. Idolatry.

Baccated
Ba'ccated. adj. [baccatus, Lat.] Beset with pearls; having many berries. Dict.

Bacchanalian
Bacchana'lian. n.s. [from bacchanalia, Lat.] A riotous person; a drunkard.

Bacchanals
Ba'cchanals. n.s. [bacchanalia, Lat.] The drunken feasts and revels of Bacchus, the god of wine.
 Ha, my brave emperor, shall we dance now the Egyptian bacchanals, and celebrate our drink? Shakesp. Ant. and Cleop.
 What wild fury was there in the heathen bacchanals, which we have not seen equalled. Decay of Piety.
 Both extremes were banished from their walls, Carthusian fasts, and fulsome bacchanals. Pope.

Bacchus Bole
Ba'cchus bole. n.s. A flower not tall, but very full and broad-leaved; of a sad light purple, and a proper white; having the three outmost leaves edged with a crimson colour, bluish bottom, and dark purple. Mortimer.

Bacciferous
Bacci'ferous. adj. [from bacca, a berry, and fero, to bear, Lat.] Berry-bearing.
Bacciferous trees are of four kinds.

 Such as bear a caliculate or naked berry; the flower and calix both falling off together, and leaving the berry bare; as the sassafras trees.

 Such as have a naked monospermous fruit, that is, containing in it only one seed; as the arbutes.

 Such as have but polyspermous fruit, that is, containing two or more kernels or seeds within it; as the jasminum, ligustrum.

 Such as have their fruit composed of many acini, or round soft balls set close together like a bunch of grapes; as the uva marina. Ray.

Baccivorous
Bacci'vorous. adj. [from bacca, a berry, and voro, to devour, Lat.] A devourer of berries. Dict.

Bachelor
Ba'chelor. n.s. [This is a word of very uncertain etymology, it not being well known what was its original sense. Junius derives it from βάκηλος, foolish; Menage, from bas chevalier, a knight of the lowest rank; Spelman, from baculus, a staff; Cujas, from buccella, an allowance of provision. The most probable derivation seems to be from bacca laurus, the berry of a laurel or bay; bachelors being young, are of good hopes, like laurels in the berry. In Latin, baccalaureus.]

 A man unmarried.
                             Such separation Becomes a virtuous bachelor and a maid. Shakesp. Midsummer Night's Dream.
 The haunting of those dissolute places, or resort to courtesans, are no more punished in married men than in bachelors. Bacon's New Atlantis.
 A true painter naturally delights in the liberty which belongs to the bachelor's estate. Dryden's Dufresnoy.
 Let sinful bachelors their woes deplore, Full well they merit all they feel, and more. Pope.
 A man who takes his first degrees at the university in any profession.
 Being a boy, new bachelor of arts, I chanced to speak against the pope. Ascham's Schoolmaster.
 I appear before your honour, in behalf of Martinus Scriblerus, bachelor of physick. Arbuthn. and Pope's Mart. Scriblerus.
 A knight of the lowest order. This is a sense no little used.

Bachelors Button
Ba'chelors Button. [See Campion, of which it is a species.]
All the sorts of this plant are hardy; they grow above two foot, and produce their flower in June and July. Millar.

Bachelorship
Ba'chelorship. n.s. [from bachelor.] The condition of a bachelor.
 Her mother, living yet, can testify, She was the first fruit of my bachelorship. Shakesp. Hen. VI.

Back (adverb)
Back. adv. [from the noun.]

 The the place from which one came.
Back you shall not to the house, unless You undertake that with me. Shakesp. Twelfth Night.
He sent many to seek the ship Argo, threatening that if they brought not back Madea, they should suffer in her stead. Raleigh's History of the World.
But where they are, and why they came not back, Is now the labour of my thoughts. Milton.
Back to they native island might'st thou sail, And leave half-heard the melancholy tale. Pope's Odyssey
Backward; from the present station.
I've been surprised in an unguarded hour,But must not now go back; the love that lay Half smother'd in my breast, has broke through all Its weak restraints. Addison's Cato.
Behind; not coming forward.
 I thought to promote thee unto great honour; but lo the Lord hath kept thee back from honour. Numb. xxiv. 11.
 Constrains the glebe, keeps back the hurtful weed. Blackmore's Creation, b. ii.
Toward things past.
 I had always a curiosity to look back unto the sorrows of things, and to view in my mind the beginning and progress of a rising world. Burnet's Theory of the Earth.
Again; in return.
The lady's mad; yet if 'twere so, She could not sway her house, command her followers, Take and give back affairs, and their despatch, With such a smooth, discreet, and stable bearing. Shakesp. Twelfth Night.
Again; a second time.
This Cæsar found, and that ungrateful age, With losing him, went back to blood and rage. Waller.
The epistles being written from ladies forsaken by their lovers, many thoughts came back upon us in divers letters. Dryd.

Back (noun)
Back. n.s. [bac, bæc, Sax. bach, Germ.]

 The hinder part of the body, from the neck to the thighs.
 As the voice goeth round, as well towards the back as towards the front of him that speaketh, so likewise doth the echo: for you have many back echoes to the place where you stand. Bacon's Nat. Hist. № 247.
 Part following enter, part remain without, With envy hear their fellow's conqu'ring shout; And mount on others backs in hope to share. Dryden.
 The outer part of the hand when it is shut; opposed to the palm.
 Methought love pitying me, when he saw this, Gave me your hands, the backs and palms to kiss. Donne.
 The outward part of the body; that which requires cloaths; opposed to the belly.
 Those who, by their ancestors, have been set free from a constant drudgery to their backs and their bellies, should bestow some time on their heads. Locke.
 The rear; opposed to the van.
 He might conclude, that Walter would be upon the king's back, as his majesty was upon his. Clarendon, b. viii.
 The place behind.
 Antheus, Sergestus grave, Cleanthus strong, And at their backs a mighty Trojan throng. Dryden.
 The part of any thing out of sight.
 Trees set upon the backs of chimneys do ripen fruit sooner. Bacon's Nat. Hist. № 856.
 The thick part of any tool, opposed to the edge; as the back of a knife or sword; whence backsword, or sword with a back; as,
 Bull dreaded not old Lewis either at backsword, single faulchion, or cudgel-play. Arbuthnot's History of J. Bull.
 To turn the back on one, is to forsake him, or neglect him.
 At the hour of death, all the friendships of the world shall bid him adieu, and the whole creation turn its back upon him. South.
 To turn the back, is to go away; to be not within the reach of taking cognizance.
 His back was no sooner turned, but they returned to their former rebellion. Sir J. Davies on Ireland.

Back (verb)
To Back. v.a. [from the noun back.]

 To mount on the back of a horse.
             That roan shall be my throne. Well I will back him strait. O Esperance! Bid Butler lead him forth into the park. Shak. Henry IV.
 To break a horse; to train him to bear upon his back.
 Direct us how to back the winged horse; Favour his flight, and moderate his course. Roscommon.
 To place upon the back.
                 As I slept, methought Great Jupiter, upon his eagle back'd, Appear'd to me. Shakesp. Cymbeline.
 To maintain; to strengthen.
                     Belike, he means,Back'd by the pow'r of Warwick, that false peer, T' aspire unto the crown. Shakesp. Henry VI.
 You are strait enough in the shoulders, you care not who sees your back: call you that backing of your friends? a plague upon such backing! give me them that will face me. Sh. H. VI.
 These were seconded by certain demilaunces, and both backed with men at arms. Sir J. Hayward.
 Did they not swear, in express words, To prop and back the house of lords? And after turn'd out the whole houseful. Hudibras.
 A great malice, backed with a great interest, can have no advantage of a man, but from his expectations of something without himself. South.
 How shall we treat this bold aspiring man? Success still follows him, and backs his crimes. Addis. Cato.
 To justify; to support.
 The patrons of the ternary number of principles, and those that would have five elements, endeavour to back their experiments with a specious reason. Boyle.
 We have I know not how many adages to back the reason of this moral. L'Estrange.
 To second.
 Factious, and sav'ring this or t'other side, Their wagers back their wishes. Dryden's Fables.

Backbite
To Ba'ckbite. v.a. [back and bite.] To censure or reproach the absent.
Most untruly and maliciously do these evil tongues backbite and slander the sacred ashes of that most just and honourable personage. Spenser's Ireland.
I will use him well; a friend i' th' court is better than a penny in purse. Use his men well, Davy, for they are arrant knaves, and will backbite. Shakesp. Henry IV.

Backbiter
Ba'ckbiter. n.s. [backbite.] A privy calumniator; a censurer of the absent.
No body is bound to look upon his backbiter, or his underminer, his betrayer, or his oppressor, as his friend. South.

Backbone
Ba'ckbone. n.s. [back and bone.] The bone of the back.
The backbone should be divided into many vertebres for commodious bending, and not be one entire rigid bone. Ray

Backcarry
Ba'ckcarry. Having on the back.
Manwood, in his forest laws, noteth it for one of the four circumstances, or cases, wherein a forester may arrest an offender against vert or venison in the forest, viz. stable-stand, dog-draw, backcarry, and bloody hand. Cowel.

Backdoor
Ba'ckdoor. n.s. [from back and door.] The door behind the house; privy passage.
 The procession durst not return by the way it came; but, after the devotion of the monks, passed out at a backdoor of the convent. Addison on Italy.
 Popery, which is so far shut out as not to re-enter openly, is stealing in by the backdoor of atheism. Atterbury.

Backed
Ba'cked. adj. [back.] Having a back.
                                         Lofty-neck'd, Sharp headed, barrel-belly'd, broadly back'd. Dryd. Virgil.

Backfriend
Ba'ckfriend. n.s. [back and friend.] A friend backwards; that is, an enemy in secret.
Set the restless importunities of talebearers and backfriends against fair words and professions. L'Estrange.
Far is our church from encroaching upon the civil power; as some who are backfriends to both, would maliciously insinuate. South.

Backgammon
Backga'mmon. n.s. [from bach gammon, Welch, a little battle.] A play or game at tables, with box and dice.
 In what esteem are you with the vicar of the parish? can you play with him at backgammon? Swift.

Backhouse
Ba'ckhouse. n.s. [back and house.] The buildings behind the chief part of the house.
Their backhouses, of more necessary than cleanly service, as kitchens, stables, are climbed up unto by steps. Carew's Survey of Cornwal.

Backpiece
Ba'ckpiece. n.s. [back and piece.] The piece of armour which covers the back.
The morning that he was to join battle, his armourer put on his backpiece before, and his breastplate behind. Camden.

Backroom
Ba'ckroom. n.s. [from back and room.] A room behind ; not in the front.
If you have a fair prospect backwards of gardens, it may be convenient to make backrooms the larger. Mox. Mech. Exerc.

Backside
Ba'ckside. n.s. [from back and side.]

The hinder part of any thing.
If quicksilver were rubbed from the backside of the speculum, the glass would cause the same rings of colors, but more faint ; the phænomena depends not upon the quicksilver, unless so far as it encreases the reflection of the backside of the glass. Newton's Opticks.
The hind part of an animal.
A poor ant carries a grain of corn, climbing up a wall with her head downwards and her backside upwards. Addison.
The yard or ground behind a house.
 The wash of pastures, fields, commons, roads, streets, or backsides, are of great advantage to all sorts of land. Mortimer.

Backslide
To Backsli'de. v.n. [from back and slide.] To fall off; to apostatize: a word only used by divines.
Hast thou seen that which backsliding Israel hath done? She is gone up upon every high mountain, and under every green tree. Jeremiah, iii. 6.

Backslider
Backsli'der. n.s. [from backslide.] An apostate.
The backslider in heart shall be filled. Prov. xiv. 14.

Backstaff
Ba'ckstaff. n.s. [from back and staff; because, in taking an observation, the observer's back is turned towards the sun.]
An instrument useful in taking the sun's altitude at sea; invented by Captain Davies.

Backstairs
Ba'ckstairs. n.s. [from back and stairs.] The private stairs in the house.
I condemn the practice which hath lately crept into the court at the backstairs, that some pricked for sheriffs get out of the bill. Bacon's Advice to Sir George Villiers.

Backsword
Ba'cksword. n.s. [from back and sword.] A sword with one sharp edge.
 Bull dreaded not old Lewis at backsword. Arbuth. J. Bull.

Bacon
Ba'con. n.s. [probably from baken, that is, dried flesh.]

 The flesh of a hog salted and dried.
High o'er the hearth a chine of bacon hung,Good old Philemon seiz'd it with a prong,Then cut a slice. Dryden's Fables.
 To save the bacon, is a phrase for preserving one's self from being unhurt; borrowed from the care of housewives in the country, where they have seldom any other provision in the house than dried bacon, to secure it from the marching soldiers.
What frightens you thus? my good son! says the priest;You murder'd, are sorry, and have been confest.O father! my sorrow will scarce save my bacon;For 'twas not that I murder'd, but that I was taken. Prior.

Baigne
To Baigne. v.a. [bagner, Fr.] To drench; to soak: a word out of use.
 The women forslow not to baigne them, unless they plead their heels, with a worse perfume than Jugurth found in the dungeon. Carew's Survey of Cornwal.

Baken


Ball (noun 1)


Ball (noun 2)


Bane (noun)


Bannock
Ba'nnock. n.s. A kind of oaten or pease meal cake, mixed with water, and baked upon an iron plate over the fire; used in the northern counties, and in Scotland.

Barometer
Baro'meter. n.s. [from βάρος, weight, and μἐτρον, measure.]
A machine for measuring the weight of the atmosphere, and the variations in it, in order chiefly to determine the changes of the weather. It differs from the baroscope, which only shews that the air is heavier at one time than another, without specifying the difference. The barometer is founded upon the Torricellian experiment, so called from Torricelli the inventor of it, at Florence, in 1643; which is a glass tube filled with mercury, horizontally sealed at one end; the other open and immerged in a bason of stagnant mercury; so that, as the weight of the atmosphere diminishes, the mercury in the tube will descend, and, as it encreases, the mercury will ascend; the column of mercury suspended in the tube, being always equal to the weight of the incumbent atmosphere. Many attempts have been made to render the changes in the barometer more sensible, in order to measure the atmosphere more accurately; and hence arose a great number of barometers, of different structures. Dr. Halley observes, in the Philosophical Transactions, that in calm weather, when the air is inclined to rain, the mercury is commonly low; in serene good settled weather, high. On great winds, though unaccompanied with rain, the mercury is lowest of all, with regard to the point of the compass the wind blows on. The greatest heights of the mercury are on easterly and north-easterly winds, cæteris paribus. After great storms of wind, when the mercury has been low, it rises again very fast. In calm frosty weather, it stands high. The more northerly places find greater alterations than the more southern; and within the tropicks, and near them, there is little or no variation of the height of the mercury. The rising of the mercury forebodes fair weather after foul, and an easterly or north-easterly wind; its falling portends southerly or westerly winds, or both.  In a storm, the mercury beginning to rise, is a pretty sure sign that it begins to abate. But there are frequently great changes in the air, without any perceptible alteration in the barometer. The alterations of the weight of the air, are generally allowed to be the cause of those in the barometer; but philosophers cannot easily determine whence those alterations rise in the atmosphere.
The measuring the heights of mountains, and finding the elevation of places above the level of the sea, hath been much promoted by barometrical experiments, founded upon that essential property of the air, its gravity or pressure. As the column of mercury in the barometer is counterpoised by a column of air of equal weight, so whatever causes make the air heavier or lighter, the pressure of it will be thereby encreased or lessened, and of consequence the mercury will rise or fall.  Again, the air is condensed or expanded, in proportion to the weight or force that presses it. Hence it is, that the higher from the sea, in the midland countries, the mercury descends the lower; because the air becomes more rarified and lighter, and it falls lowest upon the tops of the highest mountains. Harris.
 Gravity is another property of air, whereby it counterpoises a column of mercury from twenty-seven inches and one half to thirty and one half, the gravity of the atmosphere varying one tenth, which are its utmost limits; so that the exact specifick gravity of the air cannot be determined when the barometer stands at thirty inches, with a moderate heat of the weather. Arbuthnot on Air.

Baron
Ba'ron. n.s. [The etymology of this word is very uncertain. Baro, among the Romans, signified a brave warriour, or a brutal man; and, from the first of these significations, Menage derives baron, as a term of military dignity. Others suppose it originally to signify only a man; in which sense baron, or varon, is still used by the Spaniards; and, to confirm this conjecture, our law yet uses baron and femme, husband and wife. Others deduce it from ber, an old Gaulish word, signifying commander; others from the Hebrew נבר, of the same import. Some think it a contraction of par homme, or peer, which seems least probable.]

 A degree of nobility next to a viscount. It may be probably thought, that anciently, in England, all those were called barons, that had such signiories as we now call court barons. And it is said, that, after the conquest, all such came to the parliament, and sat as nobles in the upper house. But when, by experience, it appeared, that the parliament was too much crouded with such multitudes, it became a custom, that none should come, but such as the king, for their extraordinary wisdom or quality, thought good to call by writ; which writ ran hac vice tantum. After that, men, seeing that this state of nobility was but casual, and depending merely on the prince's pleasure, obtained of the king letters patent of this dignity to them and their heirs male: and these were called barons by letters patent, or by creation; whose posterity are now those barons that are called lords of the parliament; of which kind the king may create more at his pleasure. It is nevertheless thought, that there are yet barons by writ, as well as barons by letters patent, and that they may be discerned by their titles; the barons by writ being those, that to the title of lord have their own surnames annexed; whereas the barons by letters patent, are named by their baronies. These barons which were first by writ, may now justly also be called barons by prescription; for that they have continued barons, in themselves and their ancestors, beyond the memory of man. There are also barons by tenure, as the bishops of the land, who, by virtue of baronies annexed to their bishopricks, have always had place in the upper house of parliament, and are called lords spiritual.

 Baron is an officer, as barons of the exchequer to the king: of these the principal is called lord chief baron, and the three others are his assistants, between the king and his subjects, in causes of justice, belonging to the exchequer.

 There are also barons of the cinque ports; two to each of the seven towns, Hastings, Winchelsea, Rye, Rumney, Hithe, Dover, and Sandwich, that have places in the lower house of parliament. Cowel.
                             They that bearThe cloth of state above, are four baronsOf the cinque ports. Shakesp. Henry VIII.
 Baron is used for the husband in relation to his wife. Cowel.

 A baron of beef is when the two sirloins are not cut asunder, but joined together by the end of the backbone. Dict.

Barrator
Ba'rrator. n.s. [from barat, old Fr. from which is still retained barateur, a cheat.] A wrangler, and encourager of law suits.
 Will it not reflect as much on thy character, Nic, to turn barrator in thy old days, a stirrer up of quarrels amongst thy neighbours. Arbuthnot's History of J. Bull.

Barrel (noun)
Ba'rrel. n.s. [baril, Welch.]

 A round wooden vessel to be stopped close.
It hath been observed by one of the ancients, that an empty barrel knocked upon with the finger, giveth a diapason to the sound of the like barrel full. Bacon's Nat. History, № 186.
                Trembling to approachThe little barrel, which he fears to broach. Dryden's Persius.
 A particular measure in liquids.  A barrel of wine is thirty one gallons and a half; of ale, thirty two gallons; of beer, thirty six gallons, and of beer vinegar, thirty four gallons.

 In dry measure. A barrel of Essex butter contains one hundred and six pounds; of Suffolk butter, two hundred and fifty six.  A barrel of herrings should contain thirty two gallons wine measure, holding usually a thousand herrings.
Several colleges, instead of limiting their rents to a certain sum, prevailed with their tenants to pay the price of so many barrels of corn, as the market went. Swift.
 Any thing hollow, as the barrel of a gun; that part which holds the shot.
Take the barrel of a long gun perfectly bored, set it upright with the breech upon the ground, and take a bullet exactly fit for it; then if you suck at the mouth of the barrel ever so gently, the bullet will come up so forcibly, that it will hazard the striking out your teeth. Digby on Bodies.
 A cylinder; frequently that cylinder about which any thing is wound.
Your string and bow must be accommodated to your drill; if too weak, it will not carry about the barrel. Moxon's Mechanical Exercises.
 Barrel of the ear, is a cavity behind the tympanum, covered with a fine membrane. Dict.

Bashful
Ba'shful. adj. [This word, with all those of the same race, are of uncertain etymology. Skinner imagines them derived from base, or mean; Minshew, from verbaesen, Dut. to strike with astonishment; Junius, from βασις, which he finds in Hesychius to signify shame. The conjecture of Minshew seems most probable.]

 Modest; shamefaced.
I never tempted her with word too large;But, as a brother to his sister, shew'dBashful sincerity, and comely love. Shakesp. M. ado about N.
 Sheepish; vitiously modest.
He looked with an almost bashful kind of modesty, as if he feared the eyes of man. Sidney.
          Hence, bashful cunning!And prompt me plain and holy innocence. Shakesp. Tempest.
Our authour, anxious for his fame to night,And bashful in his first attempt to write,Lies cautiously obscure. Addison's Drummer, Prologue.

Be
To Be. v.n. [This word is so remarkably irregular, that it is necessary to set down many of its terminations.



     Present.    
I am,    
thou art,    
he is,    
we are,    
&c.


 
am,
aꞃꞇ,
ıꞅ,
aꞃon,
Sax.


     Preter.    
I was,    
thou wert,    
he was,    
we were,    
&c.


 
ƿæꞃ
ƿæꞃ
ƿaꞃ,
ƿæꞃon
Sax.


 The conjunctive mood.


 
I be,    
thou beest,    
he be,    
we be,    
&c.


 
bo,
bıꞅꞇ,
bo,
bon,
Sax.]



 To have some certain state, condition, quality, or accident; as, the man is wife.
                                 Seventy senators died By their proscriptions, Cicero being one. Shakesp. J. Cæsar.
 He hath to night been in unusual pleasure. Macbeth.
 Be what thou hop'st to be, or what thou art, Resign to death, it is not worth enjoying. Shakesp. H. VI.
                                 Be but about To say, she's a goodly lady, and The justice of your hearts will add thereto, 'Tis pity she's not honest, honourable. Shak. Winter's Tale.
 Let them shew the former things what they be, that we may consider them. Isaiah, xli. 22.
                                 Therefore be sure, Thou, when the bridegroom with his feastful friends Passes to bliss at the mid hour of night,  Hast gain'd thy entrance, virgin wise and pure. Par. Reg.
 Is it not easy to discern what such men would be at. Stillingfl.
 To say a man has a clear idea of quantity, without knowing how great it is, is to say, he has the clear idea of the number of the sands, who knows not how many they be. Locke.
 It is the auxiliary verb by which the verb passive is formed.
 The wine of life is drawn, and the meer lees Is left this vault to brag of. Shakesp. Macbeth.
 To exist; to have existence.
                                 The times have been, That when the brains were out the man would die. Macbeth.
 Here cease, ye pow'rs, and let your vengeance end, Troy is no more, and can no more offend. Dryden.
         All th' impossibilities, which poets Count to extravagance of loose description, Shall sooner be. Rowe's Ambitious Stepmother.
 To be contents his natural desire; He asks no angel's wing, nor seraph's fire. Pope's Ess. on M.
 To have something by appointment or rule.
 If all political power be derived only from Adam, and be to descend only to his successive heirs, by the ordinance of God, and divine institution, this is a right antecedent and paramount to all government. Locke.

Beach
Beach. n.s. The shore; particularly that part that is dashed by the waves; the strand.
 The fishermen, that walk upon the beach, Appear like mice. Shakesp. King Lear.
 Deep to the rocks of hell, the gather'd beach They fasten'd, and the mole immense wrought on, Over the foaming deep. Milton's Par. Lost, b. x. l. 299.
 They find the washed amber further out upon the beaches and shores, where it has been longer exposed. Woodward on Fossils.

Beadle
Be'adle. n.s. [bẏꝺl, Sax. a messenger; bedeau, Fr. bedel, Sp. bedelle, Dutch.]

 A messenger or servitor belonging to a court. Cowel.

 A petty officer in parishes, whose business it is to punish petty offenders.
 A dog's obey'd in office. Thou rascal beadle, hold thy bloody hand: Why dost thou lash that whore? Shakesp. King Lear.
 They ought to be taken care of in this condition, either by the beadle or the magistrate. Spectator, № 130.
 Their common loves, a lewd abandon'd pack, The beadle's lash still flagrant on their back. Prior.

Bear (verb active)
To Bear. v.a. pret. I bore, or bare; part. pass. bore, or born. [boꞃan, bꞃan, Sax. bairan, Gothick. It is sounded as bare, as the are in care and dare.]

 This is a word used with such latitude, that it is not easily explained.
We say to bear a burden, to bear sorrow or reproach, to bear a name, to bear a grudge, to bear fruit, or to bear children. The word bear is used in very different senses. Watt's Logick.
 To carry as a burden.
They bear him upon the shoulder; they carry him and set him in his place. Isaiah, xlvi. 7.
And Solomon had threescore and ten thousand that bare burdens. 1 Kings, v. 15.
As an eagle stirreth up her nest, fluttereth over her young, spreadeth abroad her wings, taketh them, beareth them on her wings. Deuteronomy, xxxii. 11.
We see some, who, we think, have born less of the burden, rewarded above ourselves. Decay of Piety.
 To convey or carry.
My message to the ghost of Priam bear;Tell him a new Achilles sent thee there. Dryden's Æneid.


A guest like him, a Trojan guest before,In shew of friendship, sought the Spartan shore,And ravish'd Helen from her husband bore.

  Dryd.



 To carry as a mark of authority.
              I do commit into your handTh' unstrained sword that you have us'd to bear. Shakesp. Henry IV. p. ii.
 To carry as a mark of distinction.
He may not bear so fair and so noble an image of the divine glory, as the universe in its full system. Hale's Orig. of Mank.
His pious brother, sure the bestWho ever bore that name. Dryden.


The sad spectators stiffen'd with their fears,She sees, and sudden every limb she smears;Then each of savage beasts the figure bears.

  Garth.


His supreme spirit or mind will bear its best resemblance, when it represents the supreme infinite. Cheyne's Phil. Prin.
So we say, to bear arms in a coat.
 To carry as in show.
Look like the time; bear welcome in your eye,Your hand, your tongue; look like the innocent flower,But be the serpent under't. Shakesp. King Lear.
 To carry as in trust.
He was a thief, and had the bag, and bare what was put therein. John, xii. 6.
 To support; to keep from falling.
Under colour of rooting out popery, the most effectual means to bear up the state of religion may be removed, and so a way be made either for paganism, or for extreme barbarism to enter. Hooker, b. iv. § 1.
And Samson took hold of the two middle pillars, upon which the house stood, and on which it was born up. Judges, xvi. 29.
A religious hope does not only bear up the mind under her sufferings, but makes her rejoice in them. Addison. Spectat.
Some power invisible supports his soul,And bears it up in all its wonted greatness. Addison's Cato.
 To keep afloat.
The waters encreased, and bare up the ark, and it was lifted up above the earth. Genesis, vii. 17.
 To support with proportionate strength.
Animals that use a great deal of labour and exercise, have their solid parts more elastick and strong; they can bear, and ought to have stronger food. Arbuthnot on Aliments.
 To carry in the mind, as love, hate.
How did the open multitude revealThe wond'rous love they bear him under hand! Daniel's Civil War.
They bare great faith and obedience to the kings. Bacon.
Darah, the eldest bears a generous mind,But to implacable revenge inclin'd. Dryden's Aurengz.
The coward bore the man immortal spite. Dryden's Ovid.
As for this gentleman, who is fond of her, she beareth him an invincible hatred. Swift.
That inviolable love I bear to the land of my nativity, prevailed upon me to engage in so bold an attempt. Swift.
 To endure, as pain, without sinking.
It was not an enemy that reproached me, then I could have born it. Psalm liv. 12.
 To suffer; to undergo.
I have born chastisements, I will not offend any more. Job, xxxiv. 31.
That which was torn of beasts, I brought not unto thee, I bare the loss of it; of my hand didst thou require it. Genesis, xxxi. 39.
 To permit; to suffer without resentment.
Not the gods, nor angry Jove will bearThy lawless wand'ring walks in upper air. Dryd. Æneid.
 To be capable of; to admit.
To reject all orders of the church which men have established, is to think worse of the laws of men in this respect, than either the judgment of wise men alloweth, or the law of God itself will bear. Hooker, b. iii.
Being the son of one earl of Pembroke, and younger brother to another, who liberally supplied his expense, beyond what his annuity from his father would bear. Clarendon.
Give his thought either the same turn, if our tongue will bear it, or, if not, vary but the dress. Dryden.
Do not charge your coins with more uses than they can bear. It is the method of such as love any science, to discover all others in it. Addison on Medals.
Had he not been eager to find mistakes, he would not have strained my words to such a sense as they will not bear. Atterb.
In all criminal cases, the most favourable interpretation should be put upon words that they possibly can bear. Swift.
 To produce, as fruit.
There be some plants that bear no flower, and yet bear fruit: there be some that bear flowers, and no fruit: there be some that bear neither flowers nor fruit. Bacon's Natural History.
They wing'd  their flight aloft; then stooping low,Perch'd on the double tree that bears the golden bough. Dryden's Æneid.
Say, shepherd, say, in what glad soil appearsA wond'rous tree that sacred monarchs bears. Pope's Past.
 To bring forth, as a child.
          The queen that bore thee,Oftner upon her knees than on her feet,Died every day she liv'd. Shakesp. Macbeth.
Ye know that my wife bare two sons. Genesis, xliv. 27.
          What could that have done?What could the muse herself that Orpheus bore,The muse herself, for her enchanting son? Milton.
The same Æneas, whom fair Venus boreTo fam'd Anchises on th' Idean shore. Dryden's Æneid.
 To give birth to.
Here dwelt the man divine whom Samos bore,But now self-banish'd from his native shore. Dryden.
 To possess, as power or honour.
When vice prevails, and impious men bear sway,The post of honour is a private station. Addison's Cato.
 To gain; to win.
As it more concerns the Turk than Rhodes,So may he with more facile question bear it;For that it stands not in such warlike brace. Shakesp. Othello.
Because the Greek and Latin have ever born away the prerogative from all other tongues, they shall serve as touchstones to make our trials by. Camden.
Some think to bear it by speaking a great word, and being peremptory; and go on, and take by admittance that which they cannot make good. Bacon.
 To maintain; to keep up.
He finds the pleasure and credit of bearing a part in the conversation, and of hearing his reasons approved. Locke.
 To support any thing good or bad.
I was carried on to observe, how they did bear their fortunes, and principally, how they did employ their times. Bacon's Holy War.
 To exhibit.
Ye Trojan flames, your testimony bear,What I perform'd and what I suffer'd there. Dryden.
 To be answerable for.
If I bring him not unto  thee, let me bear the blame for ever. Genesis, xliii. 9.
O more than madmen! you yourselves shall bearThe guilt of blood and sacrilegious war. Dryden.
 To supply.
What have you under your arm? Somewhat, that will bear your charges in your pilgrimage? Dryden's Spanish Friar.
 To be the object of.
I'll be your father and your brother too;Let me but bear your love, I'll bear your cares. Shakesp. Henry IV. p. ii.
 To behave; to act in character.
            Some good instruction give,How I may bear me here. Shakesp. Tempest.
Hath he born himself penitent in prison? Shakesp. Measure for Measure.
 To hold; to restrain.
Do you suppose the state of this realm to be now so feeble, that it cannot bear off a greater blow than this? Hayward.
 To impel; to urge; to push.
The residue were so disordered as they could not conveniently fight or fly, and not only justled and bore down one another, but, in their confused tumbling back, brake a part of the avant-guard. Sir. J. Hayward.
              Contention, like a horseFull of high feeding, madly hath broke loose,And bears down all before him. Shakesp. Henry IV. p. ii.


Their broken oars, and floating planks, withstandTheir passage, while they labour to the land;And ebbing tides bear back upon th' uncertain sand.

  Dryden's Æneid.


Now with a noiseless gentle courseIt keeps within the middle bed;Anon it lifts aloft the head,And bears down all before it with impetuous force. Dryden.
Truth is born down, attestations neglected, the testimony of sober persons despised. Swift.
The hopes of enjoying the abbey lands would soon bear down all considerations, and be an effectual incitement to their perversion. Swift.
 To conduct; to manage.
                      My hope isSo to bear through, and out, the consulship,As spite shall ne'er wound you, though it may me. Ben Johnson's Catiline.
 To press.
Cæsar doth bear me hard; but he loves Brutus. Shakesp. Julius Cæsar.
Though he bear me hard,I must do him right. Ben. Johnson's Catiline.
These men bear hard upon the suspected party, pursue her close through all her windings. Addison. Spectator, № 170.
 To incite; to animate.
But confidence then bore thee on; secureEither to meet no danger, or to findMatter of glorious trial. Milton's Par. Lost, b. i. l. 1175.
 To bear a body. A colour is said to bear a body in painting, when it is capable of being ground so fine, and mixing with the oil so entirely, as to seem only a very thick oil of the same colour.

 To bear date. To carry the mark of the time when any thing was written.

 To bear a price. To have a certain value.

 To bear in hand. To amuse with false pretences; to deceive.
Your daughter, whom she bore in hand to loveWith such integrity, she did confess,Was as a scorpion to her sight. Shakesp. Cymbeline.
                He griev'd,That so his sickness, age, and impotence,Was falsely born in hand, sends out arrestsOn Fortinbras. Shakesp. Hamlet.
He repaired to Bruges, desiring of the states of Bruges, to enter peaceably into their town, with a retinue fit for his estate; and bearing them in hand, that he was to communicate with them of divers matters of great importance, for their good. Bacon's Henry VII.
It is no wonder, that some would bear the world in hand, that the apostle's design and meaning is for presbytery, though his words are for episcopacy. South.
 To bear off. To carry away by force.
I will respect thee as a father, ifThou bear'st my life off hence. Shakesp. Winter's Tale.
The sun views half the earth on either way,And here brings on, and there bears off the day. Creech.
Give but the word, we'll snatch this damsel up,And bear her off. Addison's Cato.
                  My soul grows desperate.I'll bear her off. A. Philip's Distrest Mother.
 To bear out. To support; to maintain; to defend.
I hope your warrant will bear out the deed. Shak. K. John.
I can once or twice a quarter bear out a knave against an honest man. Shakesp. Henry IV. p. ii.
Changes are never without danger, unless the prince be able to bear out his actions by power. Sir J. Hayward.
Quoth Sidrophel, I do not doubtTo find friends that will bear me out. Hudibras.
It is company only that can bear a man out in an ill thing. South.
I doubted whether that occasion could bear me out in the confidence of giving your ladyship any further trouble. Temple.

Beard (noun)


Beard (verb)


Bed (noun)
Bed. n.s. [bꝺ, Sax.]

 Something made to sleep on:
Lying not erect, but hollow, which is in the making of the bed; or with the legs gathered up, which is in the posture of the body, is the more wholsome. Bacon's Nat. Hist. № 738.
Rigour now is gone to bed,And advice with scrupulous head. Milton.
Those houses then were caves, or homely sheds,With twining oziers fenc'd, and moss their beds. Dryden.
 Lodging; the convenience of a place to sleep in.
          On my knees I beg,That you'll vouchsafe me, raiment, bed, and food. Shakesp. King. Lear.
 Marriage.
George, the eldest son of this second bed, was, after the death of his father, by the singular care and affection of his mother, well brought up. Clarendon.
 Bank of earth raised in a garden.
Herbs will be tenderer and fairer, if you take them out of beds, when they are newly come up, and remove them into pots, with better earth. Bacon's Nat. Hist. № 459.
 The channel of a river, or any hollow.
So high as heav'd the tumid hills, so lowDown sunk a hollow bottom, broad, and deep,Capacious bed of waters. Milt. Par. Lost, b. vii. l. 288.
The great magazine for all kinds of treasure is supposed to be the bed of the Tiber.  We may be sure, when the Romans lay under the apprehensions of seeing their city sacked by a barbarous enemy, that they would take care to bestow such of their riches that way, as could best bear the water. Addison.
 The place where any thing is generated, or reposited.
See hoary Albula's infected tideO'er the warm bed of smoaking sulphur glide. Addison.
 A layer; a stratum; a body spread over another.
I see no reason, but the surface of the land should be as regular as that of the water, in the first production of it; and the strata, or beds within, lie as even. Burnet's Theory.
 To bring to Bed. To deliver a child. It is often used with the particle of; as, she was brought to bed of a daughter.
Ten months after Florimel happen'd to wed,And was brought in a laudable manner to bed. Prior.
 To make the Bed. To put the bed in order after it has been used.
I keep his house, and I wash, wring, brew, bake, scour, dress meat, and make the beds, and so all myself. Shakesp. Merry Wives of Windsor.

Belace
Bela'ce. v.a. [Sea term.] To fasten; as to belace a rope. D.

Belamie
Be'lamie. n.s. [bel amie, Fr.] A friend; an intimate. This word is out of use.
                            Wise Socrates Pour'd out his life, and last philosophy, To the fair Critias, his dearest belamie. Fairy Q. b. ii. c. vii.

Belles Lettres
Belles Lettres. n.s. [Fr.] Polite literature. It has no singular.
 The exactness of the other, is to admit of something like discourse, especially in what regards the belles lettres. Tatler.

Belluine
Be'lluine. adj. [belluinus, Lat.] Beastly; belonging to a beast; savage; brutal.
 If human actions were not to be judged, men would have no advantage over beasts. At this rate, the animal and belluine life would be the best. Atterbury's Preface to his Sermons.

Belly (noun)
Be'lly. n.s. [balg, Dutch; bol, bola, Welch.]

 That part of the human body which reaches from the breast to the thighs, containing the bowels.
                 The body's members Rebell'd against the belly; thus accus'd it; — That only like a gulf it did remain, Still cupboarding the viand, never bearing Like labour with the rest. Shakesp. Coriolanus.
 In beasts, it is used, in general, for that part of the body next the ground.
 And the Lord said unto the serpent, upon thy belly shalt thou go, and dust shalt thou eat all the days of thy life. Gen. iii. 14.
 The womb; in this sense, it is commonly used ludicrously or familiarly.
 I shall answer that better, than you can the getting up of the negro's belly: the Moor is with child by you. Shakesp. Merchant of Venice.
 The secret is grown too big for the pretence, like Mrs. Primly's big belly. Congreve's Way of the World.
 That part of man which requires food, in opposition to the back, or that which demands cloaths.
 They were content with a licentious and idle life, wherein they might fill their bellies by spoil, rather than by labour. Sir J. Hayward.
 Whose god is their belly. Phil. iii. 19.
 He that sows his grain upon marble, will have many a hungry belly before harvest. Arbuthnot's History of J. Bull.
 The part of any thing that swells out into a larger capacity.
 Fortune sometimes turneth the handle of the bottle, which is easy to be taken hold of; and, after, the belly, which is hard to grasp. Bacon's Ornament. Ration.
 An Irish harp hath the concave, or belly, not along the strings, but at the end of the strings. Bacon's Nat. History, № 146.
 Any place in which something is inclosed.
 Out of the belly of hell cried I, and thou heardst my voice. Jonah, ii. 2.

Beloved
Belo'ved. participle. [from belove, derived of love. It is observable, that, though the participle be of very frequent use, the verb is seldom or never admitted; as we say, you are much beloved by me, but not I belove you.] Loved; dear.
             I think, it is not meet, Mark Anthony, so well belov'd of Cæsar, Should outlive Cæsar. Shakesp. Julius Cæsar.
         In likeness of a dove The spirit descended, while the father's voice From heav'n pronounc'd him his beloved son. Milton's Paradise Regained, b. i. l. 32.

Berg
Berg. See Burrow.

Berlin
Berli'n. n.s. [from Berlin, the city where they were first made.] A coach of a particular form.
 Beware of Latin authors all! Nor think your verses sterling, Though with a golden pen you scrawl, And scribble in a berlin. Swift.

Bewray
To Bewra'y. v.a. [ƿꞃᵹan, bƿꞃᵹan, Saxon.]

 To betray; to discover perfidiously.
Fair feeling words he wisely 'gan display,And, for her humour fitting purpose, fainTo tempt the cause itself for to bewray. Fairy Queen, b. i.
 To shew; to make visible: this word is now little in use.
She saw a pretty blush in Philodea's cheeks bewray a modest discontentment. Sidney.
Men do sometimes bewray that by deeds, which to confess they are hardly drawn. Hooker, b. i. § 7.
Next look on him that seems for counsel fit,Whose silver locks bewray his store of days. Fairfax, b. iii.

Bewrayer
Bewra'yer. n.s. [from bewray.] Betrayer; discoverer; divulger.
When a friend is turned into an enemy, and a bewrayer of secrets, the world is just enough to accuse the perfidiousness of the friend. Addison. Spectator, № 225.

Beyond
Beyo'nd. prep. [bᵹonꝺ, bᵹonꝺan, Saxon.]

 Before; at a distance not yet reached.
What's fame? a fancy'd life in others breath,A thing beyond us, ev'n before our deathJust what you hear, you have. Pope's Essay on Man.
 On the farther side of.
Neither is it beyond the sea, that thou shouldst say, who shall go over the sea for us, and bring it unto us. Deut. xxx. 13.
Now we are on land, we are but between death and life; for we are beyond the old world and the new. Bacon's New Atlantis.
We cannot think men beyond sea will part with their money for nothing. Locke.
 Farther onward than.
He that sees a dark and shady grove,Stays not, but looks beyond it on the sky. Herbert.
 Past; out of the reach of.
Beyond the infinite and boundless reachOf mercy, if thou did'st this deed of death,Art thou damn'd, Hubert. Shakesp. King John.
                    Yet these declareThy goodness beyond thought, and pow'r divine. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. v. l. 158.
The just, wise, and good God, neither does, nor can require of man any thing that is impossible, or naturally beyond his power to do. South.
Consider the situation of our earth; it is placed so conveniently, that plants flourish, and animals live; this is matter of fact, and beyond all dispute. Bentley's Sermons.
 Above; exceeding to a greater degree than.
Timotheus was a man both in power, riches, parentage, goodness, and love of his people, beyond any of the great men of my country. Sidney.
One thing, in this enormous accident, is, I must confess, to me beyond all wonder. Wotton.
To his expences, beyond his income, add debauchery, idleness, and quarrels amongst his servants, whereby his manufactures are disturbed, and his business neglected. Locke.
As far as they carry conviction to any man's understanding, my labour may be of use: beyond the evidence it carries with it, I advise him not to follow any man's interpretation. Locke.
 Above in excellence.
His satires are incomparably beyond Juvenal's; if to laugh and rally, is to be preferred to railing and declaiming. Dryden.
 Remote from; not within the sphere of.
With equal mind, what happens, let us bear;Nor joy, nor grieve too much for things beyond our care. Dryden's Fables.
 To go beyond, is to deceive; to circumvent.
She made earnest benefit of his jest, forcing him to do her such services, as were both cumbersome and costly; while he still thought he went beyond her, because his heart did not commit the idolatry. Sidney.
That no man go beyond, and defraud his brother in any matter. 1 Thess. iv. 6.

Bezel
Be'zel.Be'zil.

n.s. That part of a ring in which the stone is fixed.

Bezil
Be'zel.Be'zil.

n.s. That part of a ring in which the stone is fixed.

Bezoar
Be'zoar. n.s. [from pa, against, and zabar, poison, Persick.]  A medicinal stone, formerly in high esteem as an antidote, and brought from the East Indies, where it is said to be found in the dung of an animal of the goat kind, called pazan; the stone being formed in its belly, and growing to the size of an acorn, and sometimes to that of a pigeon's egg.  Were the real virtues of this stone answereable to its reputed ones, it were doubtless a panacea.  Indeed its rarity, and the peculiar manner of its formation, which is now supposed to be fabulous, have perhaps contributed as much to its reputation as its intrinsick worth.  At present, it begins to be discarded in the practice of medicine, as of no efficacy at all.  There are also some occidental bezoars brought from Peru, which are reckoned inferiour to the oriental.  The name of this stone is also applied to several chymical compositions, designed for antidotes, or counter-poisons; as mineral, solar, and jovial bezoars. Savary. Chambers.

Bezoardick
Bezoa'rdick. adj. [from bezoar.] Medicines compounded with bezoar.
The bezoardicks are necessary to promote sweat, and drive forth the putrefied particles. Floyer on the Humours.

Biangulated
Bia'ngulated.Bia'ngulous.

adj. [from binus and angulus, Lat.] Having corners or angles. Dict.

Biangulous
Bia'ngulated.Bia'ngulous.

adj. [from binus and angulus, Lat.] Having corners or angles. Dict.

Bias (adverb)
Bi'as. adv. It seems to be used adverbially in the following passage, conformably to the French, mettre une chose de biais, to give any thing a wrong interpretation.
      Every action that hath gone before,Whereof we have record, trial did drawBias and thwart, not answering the aim. Shakesp. Troilus and Cressida.

Bias (noun)
Bi'as. n.s. [biais, Fr. said to come from bihay, an old Gaulish word, signifying cross, or thwart.]

 The weight lodged on one side of a bowl, which turns it from the straight line.
Madam, we'll play at bowls —— 'Twill make me think the world is full of rubs,And that my fortune runs against the bias. Shakesp. R. II.
 Any thing which turns a man to a particular course; or gives the direction to his measures.
                  You have been mistook:But nature to her bias drew in that. Shakesp. Twelfth Night.
This is that boasted bias of thy mind,By which one way to dulness 'tis inclin'd. Dryden's Mackfl.
Morality influences mens lives, and gives a bias to all their actions. Locke.
Wit and humour, that expose vice and folly, furnish useful diversions.  Raillery, under such regulations, unbends the mind from severer contemplations, without throwing it off from its proper bias. Addison's Freeholder, № 45.
Thus nature gives us, let it check our pride,The virtue nearest to our vice ally'd;Reason the bias turns to good or ill. Pope's Essay on Man.
 Propension; inclination.
As for the religion of our poet, he seems to have some little bias towards the opinions of Wickliff. Dryd. Fab. Preface.

Bias (verb)
To Bi'as. v.a. [from the noun.] To incline to some side; to balance one way; to prejudice.
Were I in no more danger to be misled by ignorance, than I am to be biassed by interest, I might give a very perfect account. Locke.
A desire leaning to either side, biasses the judgment strangely; by indifference for every thing but truth, you will be excited to examine. Watts's Improvement of the Mind.

Bib (noun)
Bib. n.s. A small piece of linen put upon the breasts of children, over their cloaths.
I would fain know, why it should not be as noble a task, to write upon a bib and hanging-sleeves, as on the bulla and prætexta. Addison on ancient Medals.

Bib (verb)
To Bib. v.n. [bibo, Lat.] To tipple; to sip; to drink frequently.
He playeth with bibbing mother Meroë, as though she were so named, because she would drink mere wine without water. Camden.
To appease a froward child, they gave him drink as often as he cried; so that he was constantly bibbing, and drank more in twenty four hours than I did. Locke

Bibacious
Biba'cious. adj. [bibax, Lat.] Much addicted to drinking. D.

Bibacity
Biba'city. n.s. [bibacitas, Lat.] The quality of drinking much.

Bibber
Bi'bber. n.s. [from to bib.] A tippler; a man that drinks often.

Bible
Bi'ble. n.s. [from βἴϐλιον, a book; called, by way of excellence, The Book.] The sacred volume in which are contained the revelations of God.
If we pass from the apostolic to the next ages of the church, the primitive christians looked on their bibles as their most important treasure. Government of the Tongue, § 3.
We must take heed how we accustom ourselves to a slight and irreverent use of the name of God, and of the phrases and expressions of the holy bible, which ought not to be applied upon every slight occasion. Tillotson, sermon i.
In questions of natural religion, we should confirm and improve, or connect our reasonings, by the divine assistance of  the bible. Watts's Logick.

Bibliographer
Biblio'grapher. n.s. [from βιβλὸς, and γραφω, to write.] A writer of books; a transcriber. Dict.

Bibliothecal
Bibliothe'cal. adj. [from bibliotheca, Lat.] Belonging to a library. Dict.

Bibulous
Bi'bulous. adj. [bibulus, Lat.] That which has the quality of drinking moisture; spungy.
Strow'd bibulous above, I see the sands,The pebbly gravel next, and guttur'd rocks. Thomson.

Bicapsular
Bica'psular. adj. [bicapsularis, Lat.] A plant whose seed vessel is divided into two parts.

Bice
Bice. n.s. The name of a colour used in painting.  It is either green or blue.
Take green bice, and order it as you do your blue bice, you may diaper upon it with the water of deep green. Peacham.

Bicipital
Bici'pital.Bici'pitous.

adj. [biceps, bicipitis, Lat.]



 Having two heads.
While men believe bicipitous conformation in any species, they admit a gemination of principal parts. Brown's Vulg. Err.
 It is applied to one of the muscles of the arm.
A piece of flesh is exchanged from the bicipital muscle of either party's arm. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. ii. c. 3.

Bicipitous
Bici'pital.Bici'pitous.

adj. [biceps, bicipitis, Lat.]



 Having two heads.
While men believe bicipitous conformation in any species, they admit a gemination of principal parts. Brown's Vulg. Err.
 It is applied to one of the muscles of the arm.
A piece of flesh is exchanged from the bicipital muscle of either party's arm. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. ii. c. 3.

Bicker
To Bi'cker. v.n. [bicre, Welsh, a contest.]

 To skirmish; to fight without a set battle; to fight off and on.
They fell to such a bickering, that he got a halting, and lost his picture. Sidney.
                                In thy faceI see thy fury; if I longer stay,We shall begin our ancient bickerings. Shakesp. Henry VI.
 To quiver; to play backward and forward.
And from about him fierce effusion rowl'dOf smoke, and bickering flame, and sparkles dire. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. vi. l. 674.
An icy gale, oft shifting o'er the pool,Breathes a blue film, and, in its mid career,Arrests the bickering stream. Thomson's Winter, l. 730.

Bickerer
Bi'ckerer. n.s. [from the verb.] A skirmisher.

Bickern
Bi'ckern. n.s. [apparently corrupted from beakiron.] An iron ending in a point.
A blacksmith's anvil is sometimes made with a pike, or bickern, or beakiron, at one end. Moxon's Mechan. Exercises.

Bicorne
Bico'rne.Bico'rnous.

adj. [bicornis, Lat.] Having two horns.


 We should be too critical, to question the letter Y, or bicornous element of Pythagoras; that is, the making of the horns equal. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. v. c. 19.

Bicornous
Bico'rne.Bico'rnous.

adj. [bicornis, Lat.] Having two horns.


 We should be too critical, to question the letter Y, or bicornous element of Pythagoras; that is, the making of the horns equal. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. v. c. 19.

Bicorporal
Bico'rporal. adj. [bicorpor, Lat.] Having two bodies.

Bihovac
Bi'ovac.Bi'hovac.Bi'vouac.

n.s.  [Fr. from wey wach, a double guard, Germ. in war.] A guard at night performed by the whole army; which, either at a siege, or lying before an enemy, every evening draws out from its tents or huts, and continues all night in arms before its lines or camp, to prevent any surprise. To raise the biovac, is to return the army to their tents at break of day. Trevoux. Harris.

Bilingsgate
Bi'lingsgate. n.s. [A cant word, borrowed from Bilingsgate in London, a place where there is always a croud of low people, and frequent brawls and foul language.] Ribaldry; foul language.
 There stript, fair rhet'rick languish'd on the ground, And shameful bilingsgate her robes adorn. Dunciad, b. iv.

Billiards
Bi'lliards. n.s. without a singular. [billard, Fr. of which that language has no etymology; and therefore they probably derived from England both the play and the name; which is corrupted from balyards; yards or sticks with which a ball is driven along a table. Thus Spenser:                     Balyards much unfit, And shuttlecocks misseeming manly wit. Hubb. Tale.]
A game at which a ball is forced against another on a table.
 Let it alone; let's to billiards. Shakesp. Antony and Cleop.
 Even nose and cheek, withal, Smooth as is the billiard ball. Ben. Johnson's Underwoods.
 Some are forced to bound or fly upwards, almost like ivory balls meeting on a billiard table. Boyle.
 When the ball obeys the stroke of a billiard stick, it is not any action of  the ball, but bare passion. Locke.

Biographer
Bio'grapher. n.s. [βίος and γραφω.] A writer of lives; a relator not of the history of nations, but of the actions of particular persons.
Our Grubstreet biographers watch for the death of a great man, like so many undertakers, on purpose to make a penny of him. Addison, Freeholder, № 35.

Biography
Bio'graphy. n.s. [βίος and γραφω.]
In writing the lives of men, which is called biography, some authors place every living thing in the precise order of time when it occurred. Watts's Logick.

Biovac
Bi'ovac.Bi'hovac.Bi'vouac.

n.s.  [Fr. from wey wach, a double guard, Germ. in war.] A guard at night performed by the whole army; which, either at a siege, or lying before an enemy, every evening draws out from its tents or huts, and continues all night in arms before its lines or camp, to prevent any surprise. To raise the biovac, is to return the army to their tents at break of day. Trevoux. Harris.

Bird (noun)
Bird. n.s. [bıꞃꝺ, or bꞃıꝺ, a chicken, Saxon.] A general term for the feathered kind; a fowl.  In common talk, fowl is used for the larger, and bird for the smaller kind of feathered animals.
              The poor wren,The most diminutive of birds will fight,Her young ones in the nest, against the owl. Macbeth.
Sh' had all the regal makings of a queen;As holy oil, Edward confessor's crown,The rod and bird of peace, and all such emblems,Laid nobly on her. Shakesp. Henry VIII.
The bird of Jove, stoop'd from his airy tour,Two birds of gayest plume before him drove. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. xi. l. 186.
Hence men and beasts the breath of life obtain,And birds of air, and monsters of the main. Dryden's Æn.
There are some birds that are inhabitants of the water, whose blood is cold as fishes, and their flesh is so like in taste, that the scrupulous are allowed them on fish days. Locke.
Some squire perhaps you take delight to rack,Who visits with a gun, presents with birds. Pope.

Bird (verb)
To Bird. v.n. [from the noun.] To catch birds.
I do invite you tomorrow morning to my house, to breakfast; after, we'll a birding together. Shakesp. M. W. of Winds.

Birth
Birth. n.s. [boꞃþ, Sax.]

 The act of coming into life.
But thou art fair, and, at thy birth, dear boy,Nature and fortune join'd to make thee great. Shakesp. K. J.
In Spain, our springs like old mens children be,Decay'd and wither'd from their infancy:No kindly showers fall on our barren earth,To hatch the seasons in a timely birth. Dryden.
 Extraction; lineage.
Most virtuous virgin, born of heav'nly birth. Fairy Q.
All truth I shall relate: nor first can IMyself to be of Grecian birth deny. Sir J. Denham.
 Rank which is inherited by descent.
He doth object, I am too great of birth. Shakesp. Merry Wives of Windsor.
Be just in all you say, and all you do;Whatever be your birth, you're sure to beA peer of the first magnitude to me. Dryden's Juvenal.
 The condition, or circumstances, in which any man is born.
High in his chariot then Halesus came,A foe by birth to Troy's unhappy name. Dryden's Virgil.
 Thing born; production.
The people fear me; for they do observeUnfather'd heirs and loathly births of nature. Shakesp. H. IV.
That poets are far rarer births than kings,Your noblest father prov'd. Ben. Johnson's Epigrams.
                Who of themselvesAbhor to join: and, by imprudence mix'd,Produce prodigious births, of body, or mind. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. xi. l. 687.
She, for this many thousand years,Seems to have practis'd with much care,To frame the race of woman fair;Yet never could a perfect birthProduce before, to grace the earth. Waller.
                        His eldest birthFlies, mark'd by heav'n, a fugitive o'er earth. Prior.
The vallies smile, and with their flow'ry face,And wealthy births, confess the flood's embrace. Blackmore.
Others hatch their eggs, and tend the birth, till it is able to shift for itself. Addison. Spectator, № 120.
 The act of bringing forth.
That fair Syrian shepherdess,Who after years of barrenness,The highly favour'd Joseph boreTo him that serv'd for her before;And at her next birth, much like thee,Through pangs fled to felicity. Milton.
 The seamen call a due or proper distance between ships lying at an anchor, or under sail, a birth. Also the proper place aboard for a mess to put their chests, &c. is called the birth of that mess. Also a convenient place to moor a ship in, is called a birth. Harris.

Bishop (noun 1)
Bi'shop. n.s. [from episcopus, Lat. the Saxons formed bıꞅcop, which was afterwards softened into bishop.] One of the head order of the clergy.
A bishop is an overseer, or superintendant, of religious matters in the christian church. Ayliffe's Parergon.
You shall find him well accompany'dWith reverend fathers, and well learned bishops. Shakesp. Richard III.
Their zealous superstition thinks, or pretends, they cannot do God a greater service, than to destroy the primitive, apostolical, and anciently universal government of the church by bishops. K. Charles.
In case a bishop should commit treason and felony, and forfeit his estate, with his life, the lands of his bishoprick remain still in the church. South.
On the word bishop, in French evíque, I would observe, that there is no natural connexion between the sacred office and the letters or sound; for evíque, and bishop, signify the same office, though there is not one letter alike in them. Watt's Logick.

Bishop (noun 2)
Bi'shop. n.s. A cant word for a mixture of wine, oranges, and sugar.
                         Fine oranges, Well roasted, with sugar and wine in a cup, They'll make a sweet bishop, when gentle folks sup. Swift.

Bissextile
Bi'ssextile. n.s. [from bis, and sextilis, Lat.] Leap year; the year in which the day, arising from six odd hours in each year, is intercalated.
 The year of the sun consisteth of three hundred and sixty five days and six hours, wanting eleven minutes; which six hours omitted, will, in time, deprave the compute; and this was the occasion of bissextile, or leap year. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. iv. c. 12.
 Towards the latter end of February is the bissextile or intercalar day; called bissextile, because the sixth of the calends of March is twice repeated. Holder on Time.

Bit (noun 1)
Bit. n.s. [bıꞇol, Saxon.] Signifies the whole machine of all the iron appurtenances of a bridle, as the bit-mouth, the branches, the curb, the sevil holes, the tranchefil, and the cross chains; but sometimes it is used to signify only the bit-mouth in particular. Farrier's Dict.
They light from their horses, pulling off their bits, that they might something refresh their mouths upon the grass. Sidney.
We have strict statutes, and most biting laws,The needed bits and curbs of headstrong steeds. Shakesp. Measure for Measure.
He hath the bit fast between his teeth, and away he runs. Stillingfleet.
                Unus'd to the restraintOf curbs and bits, and fleeter than the winds. Addis. Cato.

Bit (noun 2)
Bit. n.s. [from bite.]

 As much meat as is put into the mouth at once.
How many prodigal bits have slaves and peasantsThis night englutted? Shakesp. Timon of Athens.
Follow your function, go and batten on cold bits. Shakesp.
The mice found it troublesome to be still climbing the oak for every bit they put in their bellies. L'Estrange.
By this the boiling kettle had prepar'd,And to the table sent the smoaking lard,A sav'ry bit, that serv'd to relish wine. Dryden's Fables.
John was the darling; he had all the good bits, was crammed with good pullet, chicken, and capon. Arbuthnot's J. Bull.
 A small piece of any thing.
Then clap four slices of pilaster on't,That, lac'd with bits of rustick, makes a front. Pope.
He bought at thousands, what with better witYou purchase as you want, and bit by bit. Pope's Epistles.
His majesty has power to grant a patent for stamping round bits of copper, to every subject he hath. Swift.
 A Spanish West Indian silver coin, valued at sevenpence halfpenny.

 A bit the better or worse. In the smallest degree.
There are few that know all the tricks of these lawyers; for aught I can see, your case is not a bit clearer than it was seven years ago. Arbuthnot's History of J. Bull.

Bit (verb)
To Bit. v.a. [from the noun.] To put the bridle upon a horse.

Bitch
Bitch. n.s. [bıꞇᵹ, Saxon.]

 The female of the canine kind; as the wolf, the dog, the fox, the otter.
And at his feet a bitch wolf suck did yieldTo two young babes. Spens. Vision of Bellay.
I have been credibly informed, that a bitch will nurse, play with, and be fond of young foxes, as much as, and in place of her puppies. Locke.
 A name of reproach for a woman.
John had not run a madding so long, had it not been for an extravagant bitch of a wife. Arbuthnot's History of J. Bull.

Bite (verb)
To Bite. v.a. pret. I bit; part. pass. I have bit, or bitten. [bıꞇan, Saxon.]

 To crush, or pierce with the teeth.
            My very enemy's dog,Though he had bit me, should have stood that nightAgainst my fire. Shakesp. King Lear.
        Such smiling rogues as these,Like rats, oft bite the holy cords in twain,Too intricate t' unloose. Shakesp. King Lear.
These are the youths that thunder at a playhouse, and fight for bitten apples. Shakesp. Henry VIII.
He falls; his arms upon his body sound,And with his bloody teeth he bites the ground. Dryden.
There was lately a young gentleman bit to the bone, who has now indeed recovered. Tatler, № 62.
Their foul mouths have not opened their lips without a falsity; though they have showed their teeth as if they would bite off my nose. Arbuthnot and Pope's Martinus Scriblerus.
 To give pain by cold.
        Here feel we the icy phang,And churlish chiding of the winter's wind;Which when it bites and blows upon my body,Ev'n till I shrink with cold, I smile. Shakesp. As you like it.
Full fifty years harness'd in rugged steel,I have endur'd the biting winter's blast,And the severer heats of parching summer. Rowe's Ambitious Stepmother.
 To hurt or pain with reproach.
Each poet with a diff'rent talent writes;One praises, one instructs, another bites. Roscommon.
 To cut; to wound.
I've seen the day, with my good biting faulchion,I would have made them skip. Shakesp. King Lear.
 To make the mouth smart with an acrid taste.
It may be the first water will have more of the scent, as more fragrant; and the second more of the taste, as more bitter, or biting. Bacon's Natural History, № 21.
 To cheat; to trick; to defraud: a low phrase.
Asleep and naked as an Indian lay,An honest factor stole a gem away:He pledg'd it to the knight; the knight had wit,So kept the diamond, and the rogue was bit. Pope.
If you had allowed half the fine gentlemen to have conversed with you, they would have been strangely bit, while they thought only to fall in love with a fair lady. Pope's Letters.

Bivouac
Bi'ovac.Bi'hovac.Bi'vouac.

n.s.  [Fr. from wey wach, a double guard, Germ. in war.] A guard at night performed by the whole army; which, either at a siege, or lying before an enemy, every evening draws out from its tents or huts, and continues all night in arms before its lines or camp, to prevent any surprise. To raise the biovac, is to return the army to their tents at break of day. Trevoux. Harris.

Blab (noun)
Blab. n.s. [from the verb.] A teltale; a thoughtless blabber; a treacherous betrayer of secrets.
The secret man heareth many confessions; for who will open himself to a blab, or blabbler? Bacon, Essay 6.
                             To have reveal'd Secrets of man, the secrets of a friend, Contempt and scorn of all, to be excluded All friendship, and avoided as a blab. Milton's Agonistes.
Whoever shews me a very inquisitive body, I'll shew him a blab, and one that shall make privacy as publick as a proclamation. L'Estrange.
I should have certainly gone about shewing my letters, under the charge of secrecy, to every blab of my acquaintance. Swift's Letters.

Blab (verb active)
To Blab. v.a. [blabberen, Dutch.]

 To tell what ought to be kept secret; it usually implies rather thoughtlessness than treachery; but may be used in either sense.
 The gaudy, blabbing, and remorseful day, Is crept into the bosom of the sea. Shakesp. Henry VI.
          Thy dues be done, and none left out, Ere the blabbing eastern scout The nice morn on the Indian steep, From her cabin'd loophole peep. Milton.
 Nature has made man's breast no windores, To publish what he does within doors; Nor what dark secrets there inhabit, Unless his own rash folly blab it. Hudribras, p. ii. c. ii.
 Sorrow nor joy can be disguis'd by art, Our foreheads blab the secret of our heart. Dryden's Juv.
 It is unlawful to give any kind of religious worship to a creature; but the very indices of the fathers cannot escape the index expurgatorious, for blabbing so great a truth. Stillingfleet.
 Nor whisper to the tattling reeds The blackest of all female deeds; Nor blab it on the lonely rocks, Where echo sits, and list'ning mocks. Swift.
To tell; in a good sense.
 That delightful engine of her thoughts, That blabb'd them with such pleasing eloquence, Is torn from forth that pretty hollow cage. Shakesp. Titus Andronicus.

Blab (verb neuter)
To Blab. v.n. To tattle; to tell tales.
                             Your mute I'll be; When my tongue blabs, then let mine eyes not see. Shakesp. Twelfth Night.

Blabber (noun)
Bla'bber. n.s. [from blab.] A tattler; a teltale.

Blabber (verb)
Bla'bber. v.n. To whistle to a horse.  Skinner.

Blabberlipped


Black (adjective)


Black (noun)
Black. n.s. [from the adjective.]

 A black colour.
                      Black is the badge of hell, The hue of dungeons, and the scowl of night. Shakesp. Love's Labour Lost.
 For the production of black, the corpuscles must be less than any of those which exhibit colours. Newton's Opticks.
 Mourning.



Rise, wretched widow, rise; nor, undeplor'd, Permit my ghost to pass the Stygian ford: But rise, prepar'd in black, to mourn thy perish'd lord.

   Dryden's Fables.



 A blackamoor.

 That part of the eye which is black.
 It suffices that it be in every part of the air, which is as big as the black of fight of the eye. Digby.

Black (verb)
To Black. v.a. [from the noun.] To make black; to blacken.
Blacking over the paper with ink, not only the ink would be quickly dried up, but the paper, that I could not burn before, would be quickly set on fire. Boyle on Colours.
Then in his fury black'd the raven o'er, And bid him prate in his white plumes no more. Addison's Ovid's Metamorph. b. ii.

Black-bryony
Black-bryony. n.s. [tamnus, Lat.] The name of a plant.
It is male and female in different plants; the flowers of the male plant consist of one leaf, and are bell shaped; but these are barren; the embryos are produced on the female plants, which become oval berries, including roundish seeds. These plants have no clasper, as the white bryony hath. The species are, 1. The common black-bryony. 2. Black-bryony of Crete, with a trifid leaf, &c. The first is rarely cultivated in gardens, but grows wild under hedges, and is gathered for medicinal use. It may be easily propagated by sowing the seeds, soon after they are ripe, under the shelter of bushes; where, in the spring, the plants will come up, and spread their branches over the bushes. Millar.

Black-cattle
Black-cattle. Oxen; bulls; and cows.
 The other part of the grazier's business is what we call black-cattle, producing hides, tallow, and beef, for exportation. Swift.

Black-earth
Black-earth. n.s. It is every where obvious on the surface of the ground, and what we call mould. Woodw. on Fossils.

Black-guard
Black-guard. adj. [from black and guard.] A cant word amongst the vulgar; by which is implied a dirty fellow; of the meanest kind.
Let a black-guard boy be always about the house, to send on your errands, and go to market for you on rainy days. Swift.

Black-lead
Black-lead. n.s. [from black and lead.] A mineral found in the lead-mines, much used for pencils; it is not fusible, or not without a very great heat.
You must first get your black-lead sharpened finely, and put fast into quills, for your rude and first draught. Peacham.

Black-mail
Black-mail. n.s. A certain rate of money, corn, cattle, or other consideration, paid to men allied with robbers, to be by them protected from the danger of such as usually rob or steal. Cowel.

Black-pudding
Black-pudding. n.s. [from black and pudding.] A kind of food made of blood and grain.
Through they were lin'd with many a piece Of ammunition bread and cheese, And fat black-puddings, proper food For warriours that delight in blood. Hudibras, p. i. cant. i.

Black-rod
Black-rod. n.s. [from black and rod.] The usher belonging to the order of the garter; so called from the black rod he caries in his hand.  He is of the king's chamber, and likewise usher of the parliament. Cowel.

Blackamoor
Bla'ckamoor. n.s. [from black and Moor.] A man by nature of a black complexion; a negro.
 They are no more afraid of a blackamoor, or a lion, than of a nurse, or a cat. Locke on Education, § 115.

Blackberried Heath
Bla'ckberried Heath. [empetrum, Lat.] The name of a plant.
It hath leaves like those of the heath; the flowers are male and female, which grow in different parts of the same plant; the male flowers have no petals; the female are succeeded by blackberries, in each of which are contained three or four hard seeds. This little shrub grows wild upon the mountains in Staffordshire, Devonshire, and Yorkshire. Millar.

Blackberry Bush
Bla'ckberry Bush. n.s. A species of bramble; which see.

Bland
Bland. adj. [blandus, Lat.] Soft; mild; gentle.
                            In her face excuseCame prologue; and apology too prompt;Which, with bland words at will, she thus address'd. Milton's Par. Lost, b. ix. l. 855.
                        An even calmPerpetual reign'd, save what the zephyrs blandBreath'd o'er the blue expanse. Thomson's Spring.

Blast (noun)
Blast. n.s. [from blæꞅꞇ, Saxon; blasen, Germ. to blow.]

 A gust, or puff of wind.
 They that stand high, have many blasts to shake them; And, if they fall, they dash themselves to pieces. Shakesp. Richard III.
                              Welcome, then, Thou unsubstantial air, that I embrace; The wretch that thou hast blown unto the worst, Owes nothing to thy blasts. Shakesp. King Lear.
 Perhaps thy fortune doth controul the winds, Doth loose or bind their blasts in secret cave. Fairfax, b. i.
 Three ships were hurry'd by the southern blast,And on the secret shelves with fury cast. Dryden's Æneid.
 The sound made by blowing any instrument of wind musick.
 In peace there's nothing so becomes a man, As modest stilness and humility; But when the blast of war blows in our ears, Then imitate the action of the tyger. Shakesp. Henry V.
 He blew his trumpet — the angelick blast Fill'd all the regions. Milt. Par. Lost, b. xi. l. 76.
The Veline fountains, and sulphureous Nar, Shake at the baleful blast, the signal of the war. Dryden's Æn.
 Whether there be two different goddesses called Fame, or one goddess sounding two different trumpets, it is certain, villainy has as good a title to a blast from the proper trumpet, as virtue has from the former. Swift.
 The stroke of a malignant planet; the infection of any thing pestilential.
 By the blast of God they perish. Job, iv. 9.

Blast (verb)
To Blast. v.a. [from the noun.]

 To strike with some sudden plague or calamity.
 You nimble lightnings, dart your blinding flamesInto her scornful eyes! infect her beauty,You fensuck'd fogs, drawn by the powerful sun,To fall and blast her pride. Shakesp. King Lear.
 Oh! Portius, is there not some chosen curse,Some hidden thunder in the store of heaven,Red with uncommon wrath, to blast the man,Who owes his greatness to his country's ruin. Addison. Cato.
 To make to wither.
 Upon this blasted heath you stop our way. Macbeth.
 And behold seven thin ears, and blasted with the eastwind sprung up after them. Gen. xli. 6.
 She that like lightning shin'd, while her face lasted,The oak now resembles, which lightning had blasted. Waller.
 To his green years your censures you would suit,Not blast that blossom, but expect the fruit. Dryden.
              Agony unmix'd, incessant gallCorroding every thought, and blasting allLove's paradise. Thomson's Spring, l. 1075.
 To injure; to invalidate.
 He shews himself either very weak, if he will take my word, when he thinks I deserve no credit; or very malicious, if he knows I deserve credit, and yet goes about to blast it. Stillingfleet's Defence of Discourses on Romish Idolatry.
 To cut off; to hinder from coming to maturity.
 This commerce, Jeshophat king of Juda endeavoured to renew; but his enterprize was blasted by the destruction of vessels in the harbour. Arbuthnot on Coins.
 To confound; to strike with terrour.
                          Trumpeters,With brazen din, blast you the city's ears;Make mingle with your ratt'ling tabourines. Shakesp. Antony and Cleopatra.

Blatant
Bla'tant. adj. [blattant, Fr.] Bellowing as a calf.
You learn'd this language from the blatant beast. Dryden.

Blatteration
Blattera'tion. n.s. [blateratio, Lat.] Noise; senseless roar.

Bleb
Bleb. n.s. [blaen, to swell, Germ.] A blister. Skinner.

Bleyme
Bleyme. n.s. An inflammation in the foot of a horse, proceeding from bruised blood, between the sole and the bone. Farrier's Dict.

Blindman's Buff
Bli'ndman's Buff. n.s. A play in which some one is to have his eyes covered, and hunt out the rest of the company.
 Disguis'd in all the mask of night, We left our champion on his flight: At blindman's buff to grope his way, In equal fear of night and day. Hudibras, p. iii. c. ii.
 He imagines I shut my eyes again; but surely he fancies I play at blindman's buff with him; for he thinks I never have my eyes open. Stillingfleet's Defence of Disc. on Romish Idolatry.

Blissom
To Bli'ssom. v.n. To caterwaul; to be lustful. Dict.

Blow a Moor


Blue
Blue. adj. [blæƿ, Sax. bleu, Fr.] One of the seven original colours.
                 There's gold, and here, My bluest veins to kiss; a hand that kings Have lipt. Shakesp. Antony and Cleopatra.
 Where fires thou find'st unrak'd, and hearths unswept, There pinch the maids as blue as bilberry. Shakesp. Merry Wives of Windsor.
 O coward conscience! how dost thou afflict me? The lights burn blue - Is it not dead midnight? Cold fearful drops stand on my trembling flesh. Shakesp. Richard III.


 Why does one climate, and one soil endue The blushing poppy with a crimson hue; Yet leave the lily pale, and tinge the violet blue?


  Prior.


 There was scarce any other colour sensible, besides red and blue; only the blues, and principally the second blue, inclined a little to green. Newton's Opticks.

Blush (noun)


Blush (verb)
To Blush. v.n. [blosen, Dutch.]

 To betray shame or confusion, by a red colour in the cheek.
                          I have mark'd A thousand blushing apparitions To start into her face; a thousand innocent shames, In angel whiteness, bear away the blushes. Shakesp. Much ado about Nothing.
                              Pale and bloodless, Being all descended to the labr'ing heart, Which with the heart there cools, and n'er returneth To blush and beautify the cheek again. Shakesp. Henry VI.
                          I will go wash: And when my face is fair, you shall perceive Whether I blush, or no. Shakesp. Cymbeline.
 All these things are graceful in a friend's mouth, which are blushing in a man's own. Bacon, Essay 28.
 Shame causeth blushing; blushing is the resort of the blood to the face; although blushing will be seen in the whole breast, yet that is but in passage to the face. Bacon's Nat. History.
 Blush then, but blush for your destructive silence, That tears your soul. Smith's Phædr. and Hippolitus.
 To carry a red colour, or any soft and bright colour.
                              To day he puts forth The tender leaves of hope; tomorrow blossoms And bears his blushing honours thick upon him. Sh. H. VI.
 Along those blushing borders, bright with dew. Thomson.
 It has at before the cause of shame.
 He whin'd, and roar'd away your victory, That pages blush'd at him; and men of heart Look'd wondr'ing at each other. Shakesp. Coriolanus.
 You have not lost all your natural modesty, but blush at your vices. Calamy's Sermons.

Blushy
Blu'shy. adj. [from blush.] Having the colour of a blush.
Blossoms of trees, that are white, are commonly inodorate; those of apples, crabs, and peaches, are blushy, and smell sweet. Bacon's Natural Hist. №. 507.
Stratonica entering, moved a blushy colour in his face; but, deserting him, he relapsed into the same paleness and langour. Harvey on Consumptions.

Bluster (noun)
Blu'ster. n.s. [from the verb.]

 Roar; noise, tumult.
                          The skies look grimly, And threaten present blusters. Shakesp. Twelfth Night.
                              To the winds they set Their corners; when with bluster to confound Sea, air, and shore. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. x. l. 665.
 So, by the brazen bluster, Troops of all tongues and nations muster. Swift.
 Boast; boisterousness; turbulence; fury.
 Spare thy Athenian cradle, and those kin, Which in the bluster of thy wrath must fall With those that have offended. Shakesp. Timon.
 A coward makes a great deal more bluster than a man of honour. L'Estrange.

Bluster (verb)
To Blu'ster. v.n. [supposed from blast.]

 To roar as a storm; to be violent and loud.
                  Earth his uncouth mother was, And blust'ring Æolus his boasted sire. Spenser.
 So now he storms with many a sturdy stoure; So now his blust'ring blast each coast doth scour. Spenser.
 To bully, to puff, to swagger, to be tumultuous.
 My heart's too big to bear this, says a blustering fellow; I'll destroy myself.  Sir, says the gentleman, here's a dagger at your service; so the humour went off. L'Estrange.
 Either he must sink to a downright confession, or else he must huff and bluster, till perhaps he raise a counter-storm. Government of the Tongue.
 Virgil had the majesty of a lawful prince, and Statius only the blustering of a tyrant. Dryden's Spanish Friar, Dedication.
 There let him reign the jailor of the wind; With hoarse commands his breathing subjects call, And boast and bluster in his empty hall. Dryden's Æneid.

Blusterer
Blu'sterer. n.s. [from bluster.] A swaggerer; a bully, a tumultuous, noisy fellow.

Blustrous
Blu'strous. adj. [from bluster.] Tumultuous; noisy.
The ancient heroes were illustrious For being benign, and not blustrous. Hudibras, p. i. c. iii.

Bmi
Bmi. n.s. A note in musick.
Gamut I am, the ground of all accord,Bmi, Bianca, take him for thy lord. Shakesp. Tam. Shrew.

Bo
Bo. interj. A word of terror; from Bo, an old northern captain, of such fame, that his name was used to terrify the enemy. Temple.

Boar
Boar. n.s. [baꞃ, Saxon; beer, Dutch.] The male swine.
To fly the boar, before the boar pursues, Were to incense the boar to follow us. Shakesp. Rich. III.
                 She sped the boar away; His eyeballs glare with fire, suffus'd with blood; His neck shuts up a thickest thorny wood; His bristled back a trench impal'd appears. Dryden's Fables.

Boar-spear
Bo'ar-spear. n.s. [from boar and spear.] A spear used in hunting the boar.
And in her hand a sharp boar-spear she held, And at her back a bow and quiver gay, Stuff'd with steel-headed darts. Fairy Queen, b. i. c. iii.
Echion threw the first, but miss'd his mark, And struck his boar-spear on a maple bark. Dryden's Ovid.

Board (noun)


Board (verb active 1)


Board (verb active 2)


Board (verb neuter)


Board-wages
Board-wages. n.s. [from board and  wages.] Wages allowed to servants to keep themselves in victuals.
             What more than madness reigns, When one short sitting many hundreds drains, And not enough is left him, to supply Board-wages, or a footman’s livery? Dryden’s Juv. sat. i.

Boarder
Bo'arder.n.s. [from board.] A tabler; one that eats with another at a settled rate.

Boarding-school


Boarish
Bo'arish. adj. [from boar.] Swinish; brutal; cruel.
         I would not see thy cruel nails Pluck out his poor old eyes; nor thy fierce sister, In his anointed flesh stick boarish phangs. Shakesp. K. Lear.

Boast (noun)
Boast. n.s. [from the verb.]

 A cause of boasting; an occasion of pride; the thing boasted.
 Not Tryo, nor Mycene, match her name, Nor great Alcmena, the proud boasts of fame. Pope's Odyss.
 An expression of ostentation; a proud speech.
 Thou that makest thy boast of the law, through breaking the law dishonoureth thou not God? Rom. ii. 23.
 The world is more apt to find fault than to commend; the boast will probably be censured, when the great action that occasioned it, is forgotten. Spectator, № 225.

Boast (verb active)
To Boast. v.a.

 To brag of; to display with ostentatious language.
 For if I have boasted any thing to him of you, I am not ashamed. 2 Cor vii. 14.
 If they vouchsafed to give god the praise of his goodness; yet they did it only, in order to boast the interest they had in him. Atterbury.
 To magnify, to exalt.
 They that trust in their wealth, and boast themselves in the multitude of their riches. Psalm xlix. 6.
 Confounded be all them that serve graven images, that boast themselves of idols. Psalm xcvii. 7.

Boast (verb neuter)
To Boast. v.n. [bôst, Welch.]

 To brag; to display one's own worth, or actions, in great words; to talk ostentatiously; with of.
 For I know the forwardness of your mind, for which I boast of you to them of Macedonia. 2 Cor. ix 2.
 Sometimes it is used with in.
 Some surgeons I have met, carrying bones about in their pockets, boasting in that which was their shame. Wiseman.
 To exalt one's self.
 Thus with your mouth you have boasted against me, and multiplied your words against me. Ezek. xxxv. 13.

Bode (verb active)
To Bode. v.a. [boꝺıan, Sax.] To portend; to be the omen of. It is used in a sense of either good or bad.
This bodes some strange eruption to our state. Hamlet.
By this design, you have opposed their false policy, with true and great wisdom; what they boded would be a mischief to us, you are providing, shall be one of our principal strengths. Sprat's Sermons.
It happen'd once, a boding prodigy!A swarm of bees that cut the liquid sky,Upon the topmost branch in clouds alight. Dryden's Æneid.
If firy red his glowing globe descends,High winds and furious tempests he portends:But if his cheeks are swoln with livid blue,He bodes wet weather by his watry hue. Dryden's Georg.

Bode (verb neuter)
To Bode. v.n. To be an omen; to foreshew.
Sir, give me leave to say, whatever nowThe omen prove, it boded well to you. Dryden's Aurengz.

Bolis
Bo'lis. n.s. [Lat.]
Bolis is a great firy ball, swiftly hurried through the air, and generally drawing a tail after it.  Aristotle calls it capra.  There have often been immense balls of this kind. Muschenbrock.

Bombard (noun)
Bo'mbard. n.s. [bombardus, Lat.] A great gun; a cannon: it is a word now obsolete.
They planted in divers places twelve great bombards, wherewith they threw huge stones into the air, which, falling down into the city, might break down the houses. Knolles's History.

Bombard (verb)
To Bomba'rd. v.a. [from the noun.] To attack with bombs.
A medal is struck on the English failing in their attempts on Dunkirk, when they endeavoured to blow up a fort, and bombard the town. Addison on ancient Medals.

Bombardier
Bombardi'er. n.s. [from bombard.] The engineer whose employment it is to shoot bombs.
The bombardier tosses his balls sometimes into the midst of a city, with a design to fill all around him with terrour and combustion. Tatler, № 88.

Bombardment
Bomba'rdment. n.s. [from bombard.] An attack made upon any city, by throwing bombs into it.
Genoa is not yet secure from a bombardment, though it is not so exposed as formerly. Addison on Italy.

Bombasin
Bo'mbasin. n.s. [bombasin, Fr. from bombycinus, silken, Lat.] A slight silken stuff, for mourning.

Bombast (adjective)
Bo'mbast. adj. [from the substantive.] High sounding; of big sound without meaning.
He, as loving his own pride and purpose,Evades them with a bombast circumstance,Horribly stuff'd with epithets of war. Shakesp. Othello.

Bombast (noun)
Bo'mbast. n.s. [This word seems to be derived from Bombastius, one of the names of Paracelsus, a man remarkable for sounding professions, and unintelligible language.] Fustian; big words, without meaning.
Not pedants motley tongue, soldiers bombast,Mountebanks drug-tongue, nor the terms of law,Are strong enough preparatives to drawMe to hear this. Donne.
Are all the flights of heroick poetry to be concluded bombast, unnatural, and mere madness, because they are not affected with their excellencies? Dryden's State of Innocence, Preface.

Bombilation
Bombila'tion. n.s. [from bombus, Lat.] Sound; noise; report.
How to abate the vigour, or silence the bombilation of guns, a way is said to be by borax and butter, mixt in a due proportion, which will almost take off the report, and also the force of the charge. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. ii. c. 5.

Bombycinous
Bomby'cinous. adj. [bombycinus, Lat.] Silken; made of silk. D.

Bona Roba
Bona Roba. n.s. [Ital. a fine gown.] A whore.
We knew where the bona robas were. Shakesp. Henry IV.

Bonasus
Bona'sus. n.s. [Lat.] A kind of buffalo, or wild bull.

Bonchretien
Bonchre'tien. n.s. [French.] A species of pear, so called, probably, from the name of a gardener. See Pear.

Bone (noun)
Bone. n.s. [ban, Saxon.]

 The solid parts of the body of an animal are made up of hard fibres, tied one to another by small transverse fibres, as those of the muscles. In a fœtus they are porous, soft, and easily discerned. As their pores fill with a substance of their own nature, so they increase, harden, and grow close to one another. They are all spongy, and full of little cells, or are of a considerable firm thickness, with a large cavity, except the teeth; and where they are articulated, they are covered with a thin and strong membrane, called the periosteum. Each bone is much bigger at its extremity than in the middle, that the articulations might be firm, and the bones not easily put out of joint. But, because the middle of the bone should be strong, to sustain its alloted weight, and resist accidents, the fibres are there more closely compacted together, supporting one another; and the bone is made hollow, and consequently not so easily broken, as it must have been, had it been solid and smaller. Quincy.
 Thy bones are marrowless, thy blood is cold. Macbeth.
 There was lately a young gentleman bit to the bone. Tatler.
 A fragment of meat; a bone with as much flesh as adheres to it.
 Like Æsop's hounds, contending for the bone, Each pleaded right, and would be lord alone. Dryden.
 To be upon the bones. To attack.
 Puss had a mouth's mind to be upon the bones of him, but was not willing to pick a quarrel. L'Estrange.
 To make no bones. To make no scruple; a metaphor taken from a dog, who readily swallows meat that has no bones.

 Bones. A sort of bobbins, made of trotter bones, for weaving bonelace.

 Bones. Dice.
 But then my study was to cog the dice, And dext'rously to throw the lucky sice: To shun ames ace that swept my stakes away; And watch the box, for fear they should convey False bones, and put upon me in the play. Dryden's Pers.

Bone (verb)
To Bone. v.a. [from the noun.] To take out the bones from the flesh.

Bonny-clabber
Bonny-clabber. n.s. A word used in some counties for sour buttermilk.
We scorn, for want of talk, to jabber,Of parties o'er our bonny-clabber;Nor are we studious to enquire,Who votes for manours, who for hire. Swift.

Booby
Bo'oby. n.s. [a word of no certain eymology; Henshaw thinks it a corruption of bull-beef ridiculously; Skinner imagines it to be derived from bobo, foolish, Span. Junius finds bowbard to be an old Scottish word for a coward, a contemptible fellow; from which he naturally deduces booby; but the original of bowbard is not known.] A dull, heavy, stupid fellow; a lubber.
But one exception to this fact we find,That booby Phaon only was unkind,An ill-bred boatman, rough as waves and wind. Prior.
Young master next must rise to fill him wine,And starve himself to see the booby dine. King.

Borough
Bo'rough. n.s. [boꞃho, Saxon.]

 It signified anciently a surety, or a man bound for others.
A borough, as I here use it, and as the old laws still use, is not a borough town, that is, a franchised town; but a main pledge of an hundred free persons, therefore called a free borough, or, as you say, francplegium. For borth, in old Saxon, signifieth a pledge or surety; and yet it is so used with us in some speeches, as Chaucer saith, St. John to Borch; that is, for assurance and warranty. Spenser's Ireland.
 A town with a corporation.

Borough English
Bo'rough English, is a customary descent of lands or tenements, whereby, in all places where this custom holds, land and tenements descend to the youngest son; or, if the owner have no issue, to his youngest brother. Cowel.

Borrel
Bo'rrel. n.s. [it is explained by Junius without etymology.] A mean fellow.
Siker thou speak'st like a lewd sorrel,Of heaven, to deemen so:Howbe I am but rude and borrel,Yet nearer ways I know. Spenser's Past.

Botanical
Bota'nical.Bota'nick.

adj. [from βότάνη, an herb.] Relating to herbs; skilled in herbs.


Some botanical criticks tell us, the poets have not rightly followed the traditions of antiquity, in metamorphosing the sisters of Phaeton into poplars. Addison on Italy.

Botanick
Bota'nical.Bota'nick.

adj. [from βότάνη, an herb.] Relating to herbs; skilled in herbs.


Some botanical criticks tell us, the poets have not rightly followed the traditions of antiquity, in metamorphosing the sisters of Phaeton into poplars. Addison on Italy.

Box (noun 1)
Box. n.s. [box, Sason; buxus, Lat.] A tree.
The characters are; The leaves are pennated, and evergreen; it hath male flowers, that are produced at remote distances from the fruit, on the same tree; the fruit is shaped like a porridge-pot inverted, and is divided into three cells, containing two seeds in each, which, when ripe, are cast forth by the elasticity of the vessels.  The species are; 1. The box-tree. 2. The narrow-leaved box-tree. 3. Striped box. 4. The golden edged box-tree. 5. The dwarf box.  6. The dwarf striped box. 7. The silver edged box. On Boxhill, near Darking in Surrey, were formerly many large trees of this kind; but, of late years, their number is pretty much decreased; yet some remain of a considerable bigness.  The wood is very useful for engravers and mathematical instrument-makers; being so hard, close, and ponderous, as to sink in water. Millar.
Box, there are two sorts of it; the dwarf box, and a taller sort, that grows to a considerable height. The dwarf box is very good for borders, and is easily kept in order, with one clipping in the year. It will increase of slips set in March, or about Bartholomew-tide, and may be raised of layers and suckers, and will prosper on the declivity of cold, dry, barren, chalky hills, where nothing else will grow. Mortimer.

Box (noun 2)
Box. n.s. [box, Sax. buste, Germ.]

 A case made of wood, or other matter, to hold any thing. It is distinguished from chest, as the less from the greater.  It is supposed to have its name from the box wood.
A perfect magnet, though but in an ivory box, will, through the box, send forth his embracing virtue to a beloved needle. Sidney, b. ii.
                             About his shelves A beggarly account of empty boxes. Shakesp. Rom. and Jul.
 This head is to open a most wide voracious mouth, which shall take in letters and papers. There will be under it a box, of which the key will be kept in my custody, to receive such papers as are dropped into it. Addison. Guard. № 98.
 This casket India's glowing gems unlocks, And all Arabia breathes from yonder box. Pope.
 The case of the mariners compass.

 The chest into which money given is put.
 So many more, so every one was used, That to give largely to the box refused. Spenser.
 The seats in the playhouse, where the ladies are placed.
 'Tis left to you, the boxes and the pit Are sovereign judges of this sort of wit. Dryden.
 She glares in balls, front boxes, and the ring, A vain, unquiet, glittering, wretched thing. Pope.

Box (noun 3)
Box. n.s. [bock, a cheek, Welch.] A blow on the head given with the hand.
For the box o' th' ear that the prince gave you, he gave it like a rude prince. Shakesp. Henry IV.
If one should take my hand perforce, and give another a box on the ear with it, the law punisheth the other. Bramhall against Hobbes.
There may happen concussions of the brain from a box on the ear. Wiseman's Surgery.
Olphis, the fisherman, received a box on the ear from Thestylis. Addison. Spectator, № 233.

Box (verb active 1)
To Box. v.a. [from the noun.] To inclose in a box.
Box'd in a chair, the beau impatient sits, While spouts run clatt'ring o'er the roof by fits. Swift.

Box (verb active 2)
To Box. v.a. To strike with the fist.

Box (verb neuter)
To Box. v.n. [from the noun.] To fight with the fist.
The ass very fairly looked on, till they had boxed themselves a-weary, and then left them fairly in the lurch. L'Estrange.
A leopard is like a cat; he boxes with his forefeet, as a cat doth her kitlins. Grew.
The fighting with a man's shadow consists in brandishing two sticks, loaden with plugs of lead; this gives a man all the pleasure of boxing, without the blows. Spectat. № 115.
He hath had six duels, and four and twenty boxingmatches, in defence of his majesty's title. Spectator, № 629.

Boy (noun)
Boy. n.s. [bub, Germ. the etymology is not agreed on.]

 A male child; not a girl.

 One in the state of adolescence; older than an infant, yet not arrived at puberty or manhood.
                 Speak thou, boy; Perhaps thy childishness will move him more Than can our reasons. Shakesp. Coriolanus.
 Sometimes forgotten things, long cast behind, Rush forward in the brain, and come to mind: The nurse's legends are for truths receiv'd, And the man dreams but what the boy believ'd. Dryden.
 A word of contempt for young men, as noting their immaturity.
 Men of worth and parts will not easily admit the familiarity of boys, who yet need the care of a tutor. Locke.
 The pale boy senator yet tingling stands, And holds his breeches close with both his hands. Pope.

Brain (noun)
Brain. n.s. [bꞃæᵹn, Sax. breyne, Dutch.]

 That collection of vessels and organs in the head, from which sense and motion arise.
The brain is divided into cerebrum and cerebellum. Cerebrum is that part of the brain, which possesses all the upper and forepart of the cranium, being separated from the cerebellum by the second process of the dura mater, under which the cerebellum is situated. The substance of the brain is distinguished into outer and inner; the former is called corticalis, cinerea, or glandulosa; the latter, medullaris, alba, or nervea. Cheselden.
If I be served such another trick, I'll have my brains ta'en out, and buttered, and give them to a dog for a new year's gift. Shakesp. Merry Wives of Windsor.
That man proportionably hath the largest brain, I did, I confess, somewhat doubt, and conceived it might have failed in birds, especially such as having little bodies, have yet large cranies, and seem to contain much brain, as snipes and woodcocks; but, upon trial, I find it very true. Brown's Vulgar Errours.
 That part in which the understanding is placed; therefore taken for the understanding.
The force they are under is a real force, and that of their fate but an imaginary conceived one; the one but in their brains, the other on their shoulders. Hammond's Fundamentals.
A man is first a geometrician in his brain, before he be such in his hand. Hale's Origin of Mankind.
 Sometimes the affections.
My son Edgar! had he a hand to write this, a heart and brain to breed it in? Shakesp. King Lear.

Bramble


Breadth
Breadth. n.s. [from bꞃaꝺ, bꞃoaꝺ, Saxon.] The measure of any plain superficies from side to side.
 There is in Ticinum, in Italy, a church that hath windows only from above: it is in length an hundred feet, in breadth twenty, and in height near fifty; having a door in the midst. Bacon's Nat. Hist. № 794.
The river Ganges, according unto later relations, if not in length, yet in breadth and depth, may be granted to excel it. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. vi. c. 7.
Then all approach the slain with vast surprize, Admire on what a breadth of earth he lies. Dryden.
In our Gothick cathedrals, the narrowness of the arch makes it rise in height; the lowness opens it in breadth. Addison.

Break (verb active)
To Break. v.a. pret. I broke, or brake; part. pass. broke, or broken. [bꞃccan, Saxon.]

 To part by violence.
When I brake the five loaves among five thousand, how many baskets of fragments took ye up? Mark, viii. 19.
Let us break their bands asunder, and cast away their cords from us. Psalm ii. 3.
See, said the sire, how soon 'tis done;Then took and broke them one by one:So strong you'll be in friendship ty'd;So quickly broke, if you divide. Swift.
 To burst, or open by force.
Moses tells us, that the fountains of the earth were broke open, or clove asunder. Burnet's Theory.
 To pierce; to divide, as light divides darkness.
By a dim winking lamp, which feebly brokeThe gloomy vapours, he lay stretch'd along. Dryden.
 To destroy by violence.
This is the fabrick, which, when God breaketh down, none can build up again. Burnet's Theory.
 To overcome; to surmount.
Into my hand he forc'd the tempting gold,While I with modest struggling broke his hold. Gay.
 To batter; to make breaches or gaps in.
I'd give bay Curtal, and his furniture,My mouth no more were broken than these boys,And writ as little beard. Shakesp. All's well that ends well.
 To crush or destroy the strength of the body.
                          O father abbot!An old man, broken with the storms of state,Is come to lay his weary bones among ye;Give him a little earth for charity. Shakesp. Henry VIII.
          The breaking of that parliamentBroke him; as that dishonest victoryAt Chæronea, fatal to liberty,Kill'd with report that old man eloquent. Milton.
Have not some of his vices weakened his body, and broke his health? have not others dissipated his estate, and reduced him to want? Tillotson.
 To sink or appal the spirit.
              I'll brave her to her face;I'll give my anger its free course against her:Thou shalt see, Phœnix, how I'll break her pride. Philips.
 To subdue.
Why, then, thou can'st not break her to the lute. —— Why, no; for she hath broke the lute to me. Shakesp. Taming the Shrew.
Behold, young Juba, the Numidian prince,With how much care he forms himself to glory,And breaks the fierceness of his native temper. Addison's Cato.
 To crush; to disable; to incapacitate.
The defeat of that day at Cropredy was much greater than it then appeared to be; and it even broke the heart of his army. Clarendon.
Your hopes without are vanish'd into smoke;Your captains taken, and your armies broke. Dryden.
 To weaken the mind.
                        Opprest nature sleeps:This rest might yet have balm'd thy broken senses,Which, if conveniency will not allow,Stand in hard cure. Shakesp. King Lear.
If any dabler in poetry dares venture upon the experiment, he will only break his brains. Felton on the Classicks.
 To tame; to train to obedience.
What boots it to break a colt, and to let him streight run loose at random? Spenser's State of Ireland.
So fed before he's broke, he'll bearToo great a stomach patiently to feelThe lashing whip, or chew the curbing steel. May's Virgil.
That hot-mouth'd beast that bears against the curb,Hard to be broken even by lawful kings. Dryden.
No sports but what belong to war they know,To break the stubborn colt, to bend the bow. Dryden.
                      Virtues like these,Make human nature shine, reform the soul,And break our fierce barbarians into men. Addison's Cato.
 To make bankrupt.
For this few know themselves: for merchants broke,View their estate with discontent and pain. Davies.
The king's grown bankrupt, like a broken man. Shakesp.
With arts like these, rich Matho, when he speaks,Attracts all fees, and little lawyers breaks. Dryden.
A command or call to be liberal, all of a sudden impoverishes the rich, breaks the merchant, and shuts up every private man's exchequer. South.
 To crack or open the skin, so as that the blood comes.
She could have run and waddled all about; even the day before she broke her brow; and then my husband took up the child. Shakesp. Romeo and Juliet.
Weak soul! and blindly to destruction led:She break her heart! she'll sooner break your head. Dryden.
 To violate a contract or promise.
              Lovers break not hours,Unless it be to come before their time. Shakesp. T. G. of Ver.
Pardon this fault, and, by my soul I swear,I never more will break an oath with thee. Shakesp.
Did not our worthies of the house,Before they broke the peace, break vows? Hudibras.
 To infringe a law.
Unhappy man! to break the pious lawsOf nature, pleading in his children's cause. Dryden.
 To intercept; to hinder the effect of.
Break their talk, mistress, quickly; my kinsman shall speak for himself. Shakesp. Merry Wives of Windsor.
Spirit of wine, mingled with common water, yet so as if the first fall be broken, by means of a sop, or otherwise, it stayeth above. Bacon's Physical Remains.
Think not my sense of virtue is so small;I'll rather leap down first, and break your fall. Dryden.
As one condemn'd to leap a precipice,Who sees before his eyes the depth below,Stops short, and looks about for some kind shrub,To break his dreadful fall. Dryden's Spanish Friar.
She held my had, the destin'd blow to break,Then from her rosy lips began to speak. Dryden.
 To interrupt.
Some solitary cloister will I choose,Coarse my attire, and short shall be my sleep,Broke by the melancholy midnight bell. Dryden's Sp. Friar.
The father was so moved, that he could only command his voice, broke with sighs and sobbings, so far as to bid her proceed. Addison. Spectator, № 164.
The poor shade shiv'ring stands, and must not breakHis painful silence, till the mortal speak. Tickell.
Sometimes in broken words he sigh'd his care,Look'd pale, and tumbled when he view'd the fair. Gay.
 To separate company.
Did not Paul and Barnabas dispute with that vehemence, that they were forced to break company? Atterbury.
 To dissolve any union.
It is great folly, as well as injustice, to break off so noble a relation. Collier of Friendship.
 To reform; with of.
The French were not quite broken of it, until some time after they became christians. Grew's Cosmologia Sacra, b. iii. c. 6.
 To open something new; to propound something by an overture.
When any new thing shall be propounded, no counsellor should suddenly deliver any positive opinion, but only hear it, and, at the most, but to break it, at first, that it may be the better understood at the next meeting. Bacon.
            I, who much desir'd to knowOf whence she was, yet fearful how to breakMy mind, adventur'd humbly thus to speak. Dryden's Fab.
 To break the back. To strain or dislocate the vertebræ with too heavy burdens.
I'd rather crack my sinews, break my back,Than you should such dishonour undergo. Shakesp. Tempest.
 To break the back. To disable one's fortune.
                                O, manyHave broke their backs, with laying manors on 'em,For this great journey. Shakesp. Henry VIII.
 To break a deer. To cut it up at table.

 To break fast. To eat the first time in the day.

 To break ground. To plow.
When the price of corn falleth, men generally give over surplus tillage, and break no more ground than will serve to supply their own turn. Carew's Survey of Cornwal.
The husbandman must first break the land, before it be made capable of good seed. Sir J. Davies on Ireland.
 To break ground. To open trenches.

 To break the heart. To destroy with grief.
Good my lord, enter here. —— Will't break my heart? —I'd rather break mine own. Shakesp. King Lear.
Should not all relations bear a part?It were enough to break a single heart. Dryden.
 To break a jest. To utter a jest unexpected.

 To break the neck. To lux, or put out the neck joints.
I had as lief thou didst break his neck, as his fingers. Shakesp.
 To break off. To put a sudden stop.

 To break off. To preclude by some obstacle suddenly interposed.
To check the starts and sallies of the soul,And break off all its commerce with the tongue. Addison.
 To break up. To dissolve; to put a sudden end to.
Who cannot rest till he good fellows find;He breaks up house, turns out the doors his mind. Herbert.
He threatened, that the tradesmen would beat out his teeth, if he did not retire immediately, and break up the meeting. Arbuthnot's History of J. Bull.
 To break up. To open; to lay open.
The shells being thus lodged amongst this mineral matter, when this comes now to be broke up, it exhibits impressions of the shells. Woodward on Fossils.
 To break up. To separate or disband.
After taking the strong city of Belgrade, Solyman returning to Constantinople, broke up his army, and there lay still the whole year following. Knolles's History of the Turks.
 To break upon the wheel. To punish by stretching a criminal upon the wheel, and breaking his bones with bats.

 To break wind. To give vent to wind in the body.

Breast (noun)
Breast. n.s. [bꞃoꞅꞇ, Saxon.]

 The middle part of the human body, between the neck and the belly.
 The dugs or teats of women which contain the milk.
The substance of the breasts is composed of a great number of glands, of an oval figure, which lie in a great quantity of fat.  Their excretory ducts, as they approach the nipples, join and unite together, till at last they form seven, eight, or more, small pipes, called tubuli lactiferi, which have several cross canals, by which they communicate with one another, that if any of them be stopped, the milk, which was brought to it, might not stagnate, but pass through by the other pipes, which all terminate in the extremity of the nipple.  They have arteries and veins from the subclavian and intercostal.  They have nerves from the vertebral pairs, and from the sixth pair of the brain.  Their use is to separate the milk for the nourishment of the fœtus.  The tubes, which compose the glands of the breast in maids, like a sphincter muscle, contract so closely, that no part of the blood can enter them; but when the womb grows big with a fœtus, and compresses the descending trunk of the great artery, the blood flows in a greater quantity, and with a greater force, through the arteries of the breasts, and forces a passage into their glands, which, being at first narrow, admits only a thin water; but growing wider by degrees, as the womb grows bigger, the glands receive a thick serum, and, after birth, they run with a thick milk; because that blood, which before did flow to the fœtus, and, for three or four days afterwards, by the uterus, beginning then to stop, does more dilate the mamillary glands. Quincy.
They pluck the fatherless from the breast. Job, xxiv. 9.
 The part of a beast that is under the neck, between the fore-legs.

 The heart; the conscience; the disposition of the mind.
Needless was written law, where none opprest;The law of man was written in his breast. Dryden's Ovid.
 The passions; the regard.
            Margarita first possess'd,If I remember well, my breast. Cowley.

Breviary
Bre'viary. n.s. [breviaire, Fr. breviarium, Lat.]

 An abridgment; an epitome; a compendium.
Cresconius, an African bishop, has given us an abridgment, or breviary thereof. Ayliffe's Parergon.
 The book containing the daily service of the church of Rome.

Brevier
Brevi'er. n.s. A particular size of letter used in printing; so called, probably, from being originally used in printing a breviary; as,
Not love thy life, nor hate, but what thou liv'st,Live well, how long or short, permit to heav'n. Milton.

Brew (verb active)
To Brew. v.a. [brouwen, Dutch; brawen, German; bꞃuƿan, Saxon.]

To make liquours by mixing several ingredients.
We have drinks also brewed with several herbs, and roots, and spices. Bacon.
          Mercy guard me!Hence with thy brew'd enchantments, foul deceiver. Milton.
 To prepare by mixing things together.
Here's neither rush nor shrub to bear off any weather at all, and another storm brewing. Shakesp. Tempest.
Take away these chalices; go, brew me a pottle of sack finely. Shakesp. Merry Wives of Windsor.
Or brew fierce tempests on the watry main,On o'er the globe distil the kindly rain. Pope's R. of the L.
 To contrive; to plot.
I found it to be the most malicious and frantick surmise, and the most contrary to his nature, that, I think, had ever been brewed from the beginning of the world, howsoever countenanced by a libellous pamphlet of a fugitive physician, even in print. Wotton.

Broach (noun)
Broach. n.s. [broche, Fr.]

 A spit.
He was taken into service in his court, to a base office in his kitchen; so that he turned a broach, that had worn a crown. Bacon's Henry VII.
Whose offered entrails shall his crime reproach,And drip their fatness from the hazle broach. Dryden's Virgil.
 A musical instrument, the sounds of which are made by turning round a handle. Dict.

 [With hunters.] A start of the head of a young stag, growing sharp like the end of a spit. Dict.

Broach (verb)
To Broach. v.a. [from the noun.]

 To spit; to pierce as with a spit.
As by a low but loving likelihood,Were now the general of our gracious empress,As in good time he may, from Ireland coming,Bringing rebellion broached on his sword. Shakesp. Henry V.
He felled men as one would mow hay, and sometimes broached a great number of them upon his pike, as one would carry little birds spitted upon a stick. Hakewell on Providence.
 To pierce a vessel in order to draw the liquour; to tap.

 To open any store.
I will notably provide, that you shall want neither weapons, victuals, nor aid; I will open the old armouries, I will broach my store, and bring forth my stores. Knolles's History.
 To give out, or utter any thing.
This errour, that Pison was Ganges, was first broached by Josephus. Raleigh.
Those who were the chief instruments of raising the noise, made use of those very opinions themselves had broached, for arguments to prove, that the change of ministers was dangerous. Swift's Examiner, № 45.
 To let out any thing.
And now the field of death, the lifts,Were enter'd by antagonists,And blood was ready to be broach'd,When Hudibras in haste approach'd. Hudibras, cant. ii.

Broad
Broad. adj. [bꞃaꝺ, Saxon.]

 Wide; extended in breadth; distinguished from length.
The weeds that his broad spreading leaves did shelter,Are pull'd up root and all by Bolingbroke. Shakesp. R. II.
The top may be justly said to grow broader, as the bottom narrower. Temple.
Of all your knowledge this vain fruit you have,To walk with eyes broad open to your grave. Dryden.
So lofty was the pile, a Parthian bow,With vigour drawn, must send the shaft below,The bottom was full twenty fathom broad. Dryden's Fables.
He launch'd the firy bolt from pole to pole,Broad burst the lightnings, deep the thunders roll. Pope.
          As cloath'd in cloudy storm,Weak, wan, and broad, he skirts the southern sky. Thomson.
 Large.
To keep him at a distance from falsehood and cunning, which has always a broad mixture of falsehood; this is the fittest preparation of a child for wisdom. Locke.
 Clear; open.
In mean time he, with cunning to concealAll thought of this from others, himself boreIn broad house, with the wooers us before. Chapman's Odyss.
It no longer seeks the shelter of night and darkness, but appears, in the broadest light. Decay of Piety.
If children were left alone in the dark, they would be no more afraid than in broad sunshine. Locke.
 Gross; coarse.
The reeve and the miller are distinguished from each other, as much as the lady prioress and the broad speaking gap-toothed wife of Bath. Dryden's Fables, Pref.
Love made him doubt his broad barbarian sound;By love, his want of words and wit he found. Dryden.
If open vice be what you drive at,A name so broad will ne'er connive at. Dryden's Albion.
The broadest mirth unfeeling folly wears,Less pleasing far than virtue's very tears. Pope.
Room for my lord! three jockeys in his train;Six huntsmen with a shout precede his chair;He grins, and looks broad nonsense with a stare. Pope.
 Obscene; fulsome; tending to obscenity.
As chaste and modest as he is esteemed, it cannot be denied, but in some places he is broad and fulsome. Dryden's. Juv. Ded.
Though, now arraign'd, he read with some delight;Because he seems to chew the cud again,When his broad comment makes the text too plain. Dryden.
 Bold; not delicate; not reserved.
Who can speak broader than he that has no house to put his head in? Such may rail against great buildings. Shakesp.
      From broad words, and 'cause he fail'dHis presence at the tyrant's feast, I hear,Macduff lives in disgrace. Shakesp. Macbeth.

Brook (verb active)
To Brook. v.a. [bꞃucan, Sax.] To bear; to endure; to support.
Even they, which brook it worst, that men should tell them of their duties, when they are told the same by a law, think very well and reasonably of it. Hooker, b. i.
A thousand more mischances than this one,Have learn'd me to brook this patiently. Shakesp. T. G. of Ver.
How use doth breed a habit in a man!This shadowy desart, ufrequented woods,I better brook than flourishing peopl'd towns. Shakesp.
          Heav'n, the seat of bliss,Brooks not the works of violence, and war. Par. Lost, b. vi.
Most men can much rather brook their being reputed knaves, than for their honesty be accounted fools. South.
Restraint thou wilt not brook; but think it hard,Your prudence is not trusted as your guard. Dryden.

Brow (noun)


Brown
Brown. adj. [bꞃun, Saxon.] The name of a colour, compounded of black and any other colour.
Brown, in High Dutch, is called braun; in the Netherlands, bruyn; in French, coleur brune; in Italian, bruno; in Greek, ὀρφυινω ἄιθοψ, from the colour of the Ethiopians; ἀιθω is to burn, and ὠψ, a face; for that blackness or swarthiness in their faces, is procured through heat.  In Latin it is called fuscus, quasi φῶς σκιᾶται, that is, from darkening or overshadowing the light; or of φωσκεῖν, which is to burn or scorch. Peacham.
I like the new tire within excellently, if the hair were a little browner. Shakesp. Much ado about Nothing.
From whence high Ithaca overlooks the floods,Brown with o'ercharging shades and pendent woods. Pope.
          Long untravell'd heaths,With desolation brown, he wanders waste. Thomson.

Brute (adjective)
Brute. adj. [brutus, Lat.]

 Senseless; unconscious.
 Nor yet are we so low and base as their atheism would depress us; not walking statues of clay, not the sons of brute earth, whose final inheritance is death and corruption. Bentl.
 Savage; irrational; ferine.
 Even brute animals make use of this artificial way of making divers motions, to have several significations to call, warn, chide, cherish, threaten. Holder's Elements of Speech.
In the promulgation of the Mosaick law, if so much as a brute beast touched the mountain, it was to be struck through with a dart. South.
 Bestial; in common with beasts.
 Then to subdue, and quell, through all the earth, Brute violence, and proud tyrannick pow'r.  Par. Regained.
 Rough; ferocious; uncivilized.
 The brute philosopher, who ne'er has prov'd The joy of loving, or of being lov'd. Pope.

Bucaniers
Bucani'ers. n.s. A cant word for the privateers, or pirates, of America.

Buff (noun)
Buff. n.s. [from buffalo.]

 A sort of leather prepared from the skin of the buffalo; used for waist belts, pouches, &c.
 A ropy chain of rheums, a visage rough, Deform'd, unfeatur'd, and a skin of buff. Dryden's Juvenal.
 The skins of elks and oxen dressed in oil, and prepared after the same manner as that of the buffalo.

 A military coat made of thick leather, so that a blow cannot easily pierce it.
 A fiend, a fury, pitiless and rough, A wolf, nay worse, a fellow all in buff. Shakesp.

Buff (verb)
To Buff. v.n. [buffe, Fr.] To strike: it is a word not in use.
 There was a shock, To have buff'd out the blood From ought but a block. Ben. Johnson's Underwoods.

Buffalo
Bu'ffalo. n.s. [Ital.] A kind of wild ox.
            Become th' unworthy browse Of buffaloes, salt goats, and hungry cows. Dryden's Virgil.

Buffle (noun)
Bu'ffle. n.s. [beuffle, Fr.] The same with buffalo; a wild ox.

Buffle (verb)
To Bu'ffle. v.n. [from the noun.] To puzzle; to be at a loss.
 This was the utter ruin of that poor, angry, buffling, well-meaning mortal, Pistorides, who lies equally under the contempt of both parties. Swift.

Buffleheaded
Bu'ffleheaded. adj. [from buffle and head.] A man with a large head, like a buffalo; dull; stupid; foolish.

Burg
Burg. n.s. See Burrow.

Burgeois
Burgeo'is. n.s. [bourgeois, Fr.]

 A citizen; a burgess.
It is a republick itself, under the protection of the eight ancient cantons.  There are in it an hundred burgeois, and about a thousand souls. Addison on Italy.
 A type of a particular sort, probably so called from him who first used it; as,Laugh where we must, be candid where we can,But vindicate the ways of God to man. Pope.

Burgess
Bu'rgess. n.s. [bourgeois, Fr.]

 A citizen; a freeman of a city, or corporate town.

 A representative of a town corporate.
The whole case was dispersed by the knights of shires, and burgesses of towns, through all the veins of the land. Wotton.

Burgh
Burgh. n.s. [See Burrow.] A corporate town or burrow.
Many towns in Cornwal, when they were first allowed to send burgesses to the parliament, bore another proportion to London than now; for several of these burghs send two burgesses, whereas London itself sends but four. Graunt.

Burrow (noun)
Bu'rrow, Berg, Burg, Burgh. n.s. [derived from the Saxon buꞃᵹ, bẏꞃᵹ, a city, tower, or castle. Gibson's Camden.]

 A corporate town, that is not a city, but such as sends burgesses to the parliament.  All places that, in former days, were called borough, were such as were fenced or fortified. Cowel.
King of England shalt thou be proclaim'dIn ev'ry burrow, as we pass along. Shakesp. Henry VI. p. iii.
Possession of land was the original right of election among the commons; and burrows were entitled to sit, as they were possessed of certain tracts. Temple.
 The holes made in the ground by conies.
When they shall see his crest up again, and the man in blood, they will out of their burrows, like conies after rain, and revel all with him. Shakesp. Coriolanus.
